1
CRIME AND POLICING BILL
EUROPEAN CONVENTION ON HUMAN RIGHTS MEMORANDUM
MEMORANDUM BY THE HOME OFFICE / MINISTRY OF JUSTICE / MINISTRY
OF DEFENCE
Introduction
1. This memorandum addresses issues arising under the European Convention on
Human Rights (“ECHR”) in relation to the Crime and Policing Bill. The
memorandum has been prepared by the Home Office, Ministry of Justice and
Ministry of Defence.
2. On introduction of the Bill in the House of Commons, the Home Secretary (the Rt.
Hon. Yvette Cooper MP) made a statement under section 19(1)(a) of the Human
Rights Act 1998 that, in her view, the provisions of the Bill are compatible with the
Convention rights.
3. The Bill supports the delivery of the Government’s Safer Streets Mission to halve
knife crime and violence against women and girls in a decade and increase public
confidence in policing and the wider criminal justice system. It aims to support
neighbourhood policing and give the police the powers they need to tackle antisocial behaviour, crime and terrorism, whilst introducing reforms to ensure that law
enforcement agencies perform to the highest standards expected by the public and
focus on front-line policing.
4. The Home Office, Ministry of Justice and Ministry of Defence consider that clauses
of, and Schedules to, this Bill which are not mentioned in this memorandum do not
give rise to any human rights issues.
Summary of the Bill
5. The Bill is split into 15 Parts.
6. Part 1 deals with anti-social behaviour (“ASB”) by making provision for Respect
Orders to tackle persistent ASB; amending the powers of the police, local
authorities and other agencies to tackle ASB (including by amendments to the AntiSocial Behaviour, Crime and Policing Act 2014); enabling the Secretary of State,
by regulations, to require relevant authorities to provide information about ASB
incidents and their response; removing the requirement for the police to issue a
warning before seizing a vehicle (such as off-road bikes, motorbikes and escooters) being driven anti-socially; and conferring a power on the Secretary of
State to issue guidance to local authorities in England about their enforcement
powers in respect of fly-tipping.
7. Part 2 makes provision about offensive weapons. It introduces a new offence
relating to the possession of a bladed article or offensive weapon with intent to use
it to cause unlawful violence (or a person to apprehend such unlawful violence) or
2
serious damage to property, or to enable another person to cause such violence or
damage; increasing the maximum penalty for offences relating to the possession,
sale etc. of offensive weapons and knives; and providing the police (and service
police of the armed forces) with a new power to seize bladed articles where they
are lawfully on private premises and have reasonable grounds to suspect the
article would be used in connection with unlawful violence.
8. Part 3 makes provision about retail crime by introducing a new offence of
assaulting a retail worker and requiring the court to impose a Criminal Behaviour
Order on those convicted of such offence; and repealing section 22A of the
Magistrates’ Courts Act 1980 which provides that that low-value shop theft is a
summary offence unless the defendant elects a jury trial.
9. Part 4 makes provision in respect of the criminal exploitation of children and
vulnerable people. It introduces a new offence of child criminal exploitation,
makes provision for child criminal exploitation prevention orders, and criminalises
the practice of ‘cuckooing’ (whereby criminals take over the home of another
person without their consent for the purpose of committing specified offences).
10.Part 5 contains several measures relating to sexual offences and offenders.
a) Chapter 1 creates new or amends existing sexual offences in relation to
children, including: a new offence of making, possession, adaptation or
supply of digital files or models designed to create child sexual abuse
material; extension of the “paedophile manuals” offence to cover AI (artificial
intelligence) generated images; a new offence of administering or
moderating of electronic services who facilitate the production or distribution
of child sexual abuse material; amends existing offences to capture a
broader range of culpable behaviour where a person engages in sexual
activity in the presence of a child or person with a mental disorder. It also
creates a new statutory aggravating factor for grooming behaviour where
the court is considering the seriousness of a child sex offence and extends
the powers of Border Force officers to compel individuals at the border to
unlock their electronic devices for search on suspicion of possession of
digital child sexual abuse material.
b) Chapter 2 places a duty on persons undertaking regulated activity (such as
teachers and health care professionals) to report child sexual abuse, subject
to specified exceptions, and creates an offence of preventing a person
subject to the duty from complying with it.
c) Chapter 3 makes further provisions about sexual offences. It confers a
power on the Secretary of State to issue guidance to the police on the
disclosure of information for the purpose of preventing child and other sex
offences; introduces new offences of taking or recording an intimate
photograph or film without consent, and installing equipment with intent to
3
enable that to happen; amends the offence of exposure (in section 66 of the
Sexual Offences Act 2003); and replaces the offence of sexual penetration
of a corpse (in section 70 of the Sexual Offences Act 2003) with a broader
offence of “sexual activity with a corpse”.
d) Chapter 4 deals with the management of registered sex offenders (“RSOs”).
The provisions require RSOs to notify the police of any new name seven
days before using it and if they intend to be absent from their home address
for five days or more; and requires certain RSOs to notify the police before
entering certain premises at which children are present. They also amend
the procedure for RSO notifications: amending the procedure in Scotland
and Northern Ireland for specifying the police stations at which notifications
are to be made; empowering the police to enable certain notifications
virtually (rather than at a police station); and enabling the police to review
whether a RSO subject to indefinite notifications requirements should be
discharged from the requirements, without an application. The provisions
also empower the police to prohibit a RSO from changing their name on
identity documents without authorisation from the police and reduce the rank
of police officer who may authorise an application for a warrant to search a
RSO’s home address.
11.Part 6 makes provision about stalking, by enabling a court to make a stalking
protection order on the conviction or acquittal of a defendant at a criminal trial and
conferring powers on the Secretary of State to issue guidance to relevant public
authorities about stalking and to the police about the disclosure of information
about the identity of alleged stalkers.
12.Part 7 makes other provision for the protection of persons. It creates a new
administering a harmful substance (including by spiking) offence; introduces a new
broader offence of encouraging or assisting serious self-harm; criminalises the
detention of a child outside the UK without the appropriate consent and enables
employers to access enhanced criminal records checks, which include a check of
the children’s barred list, for those working with children in a supervised capacity.
13.Part 8 provides for new offences to prevent theft and fraud. It introduces new
offences to criminalise the possession, importation, manufacture, adaptation,
supply or offering to supply of electronic devices for use in vehicle theft; new
offences relating to the possession or supply of a “SIM farm” with associated
powers of entry and search for evidence of those offences; and offences relating
to the possession or supply of other electronic communications technologies that
can be used to facilitate fraud via. electronic communications network and services
(with such technologies specified in regulations made by the Secretary of State).
14.Part 9 provides for three new offences relating to public order: (a) wearing or
otherwise using an item that conceals identity in a public place within a designated
4
locality; (b) possession of pyrotechnics at protests; and (c) climbing on a specified
war memorial.
15.Part 10 confers new or modified powers on the police and other law
enforcement agencies. It provides investigative agencies with a power to apply
to the court for an order that a third-party entity involved in the provision of internet
protocol (“IP”) addresses and internet domain names should prevent access to an
IP address or domain name; provides police (and the service police) with a new
power to enter and search premises (private or public) where stolen goods have
been electronically tracked to premises and there are reasonable grounds to
believe the goods are on the premises and that it is not reasonably practicable to
obtain a warrant; and a connected power for seizure of stolen goods and theft
offence evidence where necessary to seize to prevent damage or disappearance;
makes changes to the existing regime of police and law enforcement access to the
Driver and Vehicles Licensing Agency (DVLA) driver register to expand such
access, and enables the Secretary of State to make regulations about access to
driver licensing information by the police and other law enforcement agencies;
expands police powers to test persons in police detention on arrest or after charge
(for persons aged 14 and over) to also permit drug testing for specified Class B
and Class C drugs (in addition to specified Class A drugs) and to take an additional
sample for drug testing, where the first is unsuitable or insufficient; and expands
the cohort of foreign national offenders who can be given a conditional caution
requiring them to leave the UK to also include those who have limited leave to
remain in the UK.
16.Part 11 reforms the confiscation regime in England and Wales and Northern
Ireland in Parts 2 and 4 of the Proceeds of Crime Act 2002 respectively and
introduces costs protections for law enforcement agencies in civil recovery
proceedings in the High Court under Part 5 of that Act.
17.Part 12 makes further provision for the management of offenders. The provisions
extend the criteria for polygraph testing to people released on licence, under
probation supervision, who have been convicted of murder and are assessed as
posing a risk of sexual offending; to those who are sentenced concurrently for a
sexual and non-sexual offence where the sentence for the sexual offence expires
before or during the licence of the non-sexual offence; and to offenders sentenced
for offending which is considered to be linked to terrorism before the Counter
Terrorism Act 2008 (“CTA 2008”) was commenced, or following commencement of
the CTA 2008 but before the Counter-Terrorism and Sentencing Act 2023 was
commenced for offences outside the specified list contained in Schedule 2 to the
CTA 2008. They also require offenders serving community and suspended
sentences to notify their probation officer or Youth Offending Team of changes to
their names or personal contact information.
18.Part 13 makes provision about the police. The provisions reform the
arrangements for the handling of complaints against the police and the
5
investigation of conduct matters and create a power for the Secretary of State to
make certain provision by secondary legislation about appeals by chief officers of
police, local policing bodies and the Independent Office for Police Conduct to
Police Appeals Tribunals.
19.Part 14 introduces new powers and modifies existing powers to in relation to
terrorism and national security. They make provision for Youth Diversion Orders
to disrupt young people involved in terrorism and divert them from the criminal justice
system; amend the Terrorism Prevention and Investigation Measures and State
Threats Prevention and Investigation Measures regimes to better manage the risk
from those involved in terrorism or hostile state activity by limiting their access to
bladed articles and other articles capable of being used as a weapon; amend section
13 of the Terrorism Act 2000 to apply the offences relating to the wearing of uniform
or the publication of images relating to a proscribed organisation to conduct in
prisons and other places of detention and to enable the police to seize any article
displayed in a public place if it arouses reasonable suspicion that an individual is a
supporter or member of a proscribed group, without the need for the article to be
used in criminal proceedings; extend the notification requirements for those
convicted of offences deemed to be connected to terrorism; add an additional
offence (breaching a foreign travel restriction order) to be captured by the terrorist
offenders sentencing, restricted release, and management on licence regimes; and
ensure that terrorism sentences with a fixed licence period available for terrorist
offenders in Northern Ireland are handed down consistently with the equivalent
sentence in England and Wales.
20.Part 15 contains miscellaneous and general provisions. Specifically, the
provisions enable the UK and devolved governments to make regulations giving
effect to international law enforcement information-sharing agreements; and
provide for a corporate body or partnership to be held criminally liable where a
senior manager commits any offence while acting within the actual or apparent
authority granted by the organisation, replacing provisions in the Economic Crime
and Corporate Transparency Act 2023 which were confined to specified economic
crimes.
PART 1 – ANTI-SOCIAL BEHAVIOUR
Respect Orders
21.Chapter 1 of Part 1 creates Respect Orders. These provisions are broadly based
on Part 1 of the Anti-social Behaviour, Crime and Policing Act 2014 (“ASBCPA
2014”). A court may make a Respect Order against a person aged 18 or over if
they are satisfied, on the balance of probabilities, that the respondent has engaged
in or threatens to engage in ASB, and the court considers it necessary to make the
order for the purpose of preventing the respondent from engaging in ASB. An order
may, for the purpose of preventing ASB, prohibit the respondent from doing, or
require the respondent to do, things specified in the order (including excluding a
person from home in cases of violence). They are preventive orders, aimed at
6
reducing the possibility of harm to the public; the legislative aim is the prevention
of behaviour that is likely to cause harassment, alarm or distress.
22.The Respect Order is based on Part 1 of the ASBCPA 2014 and permits the
relevant authority to make an application without notice, apply for an interim order
and to vary or discharge the order.
23.It is an offence for a person, without reasonable excuse, to do anything the person
is prohibited from doing, or to fail to do anything the person is required to do, by
the Respect Order. A respondent who has been issued with a Respect Order which
requires them to participate in a particular activity must be given a warning letter
from the person responsible for supervising the activity before action may be taken
for failure to comply1
.
24.A person who commits an offence is liable on summary conviction to imprisonment
for a term not exceeding the general limit in the magistrates’ court or a fine (or
both); on conviction on indictment to imprisonment for a period not exceeding 2
years or a fine (or both).
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
25.Article 5 is concerned with the deprivation of liberty and not with mere restrictions
on freedom of movement. The provisions give the court the discretion to impose
prohibitions on an individual. The court may only impose proportionate prohibitions
or requirements which restrict an individual’s movement. The ECtHR has held, in
Guzzardi v Italy2
, that the different between restriction on movement and
deprivation of liberty is one of degree or intensity, rather than nature or substance.
The domestic courts have held, in individual cases, that no deprivation of liberty
arose from control orders imposing a curfew alongside other restrictions on
conduct. The provisions allow courts to determine appropriate prohibitions which
do not amount to the kind of arbitrary detention proscribed by Article 5. Accordingly,
the Government is of the view the provisions are compatible with Article 5.
Article 6 - Right to a fair trial
26.Respect Orders engage the civil limb of Article 6, as they relate to the determination
of civil rights and obligations. It is assessed that they do not amount to a “criminal
charge” within the meaning of Article 6(2) and (3) ECHR. The Government is
satisfied that the proceedings where a Respect Order may be imposed satisfy fair
trial requirements. The rules which govern the imposition of the order ensure
participation of the person concerned in the court process, and the existence of a
prescribed right of appeal and ability to subsequently apply to the court to vary or
discharge the order affords further safeguards. The compatibility of a civil standard
for analogous civil preventative orders with Article 6 ECHR was recently affirmed
1 This will be 12 months ending with the date of the failure, the person has been given a warning
letter.
2
(40146/98)
7
by the Supreme Court in Jones v Birmingham City Council3
. The Government is
satisfied that the provisions do not, therefore, violate Article 6 and adequate
safeguards exist to ensure procedural fairness.
27.Breach of a Respect Order amounts to a criminal offence. Proceedings taken for
breach of a criminal behaviour order are criminal in character under domestic law
and constitute a “criminal charge” for the purposes of Article 6. The usual
processes and appeal routes apply as for criminal proceedings, and the
Government is satisfied that existing safeguards for criminal court hearings meet
the criminal limb of Article 6.
Articles 8, 9, 10 and 11 – Right to respect for private and family life, home
and correspondence, freedom of thought, conscience and religion, freedom
of expression and freedom of assembly
28.The new Respect Order enables the court to impose orders with a range of
conditions, which may include conditions such as prohibiting the recipient from
contacting specified individuals and attending certain locations, requiring an
individual to desist from doing a specified act and requesting the surrender of
something being used in ASB which is causing harassment alarm or distress, such
as alcohol. Similarly to civil injunctions (under section 1 of the ASBCPA 2014) a
Respect Order may exclude a person from home in cases of violence or risk of
harm.
29.As such, the Respect Order may engage Article 8 if an order is imposed which
prohibits the recipient from contacting a person who may be a family member, or
precluding the recipient from entering a specified area where it transpires the
recipient has friends or family. Article 9 may be engaged in circumstances where
the recipient states that those people/places that they wish to assemble with are
part of their religious, political or philosophical group. Article 10 may be engaged
insofar as any prohibition or requirement interferences with freedom of expression
by prohibiting noise, or an individual communicating in a specified way or with
specified persons, which the recipient asserts interferes with their freedom of
expression (political or religious opinions). Finally, it is possible Article 11 may be
engaged if (for example) an order prohibited the recipient from meeting with
specified groups of people thereby limiting freedom of assembly or association.
30.The Government is satisfied that the provisions are lawful, and any interference
arising will be a proportionate interference with these qualified rights. The new
provisions are necessary to disrupt the problem of a long-term ASB in local
environments and combat the increase in ASB which is responsible for causing
harassment alarm and distress. They pursue the legitimate aim of protecting the
health and rights of others as well as the prevention of crime and disorder. The
provisions are “lawful” as the tests for imposition of prohibitions or requirements
are clearly set out in primary legislation (prescribed by law) and the circumstances
3 Jones v Birmingham City Council 2023 UKSC 27
8
in which such prohibitions or requirements may be imposed may be committed are
sufficiently foreseeable for the general public.
31.Any prohibitions or requirements imposed will strike the right balance between the
subject of the order’s convention rights, and the rights of others. Judicial decisions
as to which prohibitions or requirements to impose in a Respect Order will ensure
that any interference is justified and proportionate in the individual case. Respect
Orders are targeted at those who commit ASB which results in harassment alarm
and distress which is a serious concern to the Government. There is also a right to
appeal, or to seek variation or discharge or an order, which further mitigates against
any risk of unjustifiable interference with convention rights.
Anti-social behaviour: increase of maximum penalty for CPN, PSPO or EO
32.Clauses 3 to 5 make amendments to ASB powers under the Antisocial Behaviour
Crime and Policing Act 2014 (“ASBCPA 2014”). Clause 4 increases the maximum
financial penalty that is applicable for breach of a community protection notice
(CPN), public spaces protection order (PSPO) or an expedited order (EO).
Article 1, Protocol 1 - Right to peaceful enjoyment of property
33.The imposition of a financial penalty would be a deprivation for Article 1 of Protocol
1 (“A1P1”) purposes and could amount to a disproportionate interference with
rights under A1P1 in certain circumstances.
34.However, whilst these amendments increase the potential financial penalty that
may be levied, they do not alter the regime in which CPNs, PSPOs and EOs
operate, and all the relevant legislative safeguards will continue to apply. For
example, those authorised to issue fixed penalty notices (“FPNs”) will continue to
have discretion as to whether to issue a FPN or not and may only do so where they
have reason to believe that an offence has been committed in relation to a breach
of a CPN, PSPO or EO. Authorised persons may determine the amount of the
financial penalty that is specified (up to the statutory maximum) to ensure that any
fine is proportionate and the usual appeal mechanisms would remain available to
challenge a penalty that was excessive. Additionally, an individual could choose
not to pay the FPN and – instead – be prosecuted for the offence (with attendant
fair trial rights etc).
35.The Government is satisfied that any interference with A1P1, as qualified right, is
justified in the public interest in protecting public safety, the prevention of disorder
or crime, and the protection of the rights and freedoms of others and that it is
therefore a control of use of property “in accordance with the general interest”
under paragraph 2 of A1P1.
9
Seizure of motor vehicles used in a manner causing alarm, distress or
annoyance
36.Clause 8 removes the requirement (under section 59 of the Police Reform Act
2002) for police to issue a warning before seizing a vehicle (such as off-road bikes,
motorbikes and e-scooters) being driven anti-socially.
37.The seizure of a vehicle by police without a prior warning may interfere with
individual’s right to peaceful enjoyment of their property (A1P1) and may engage
the civil limb of their right to a fair trial (Article 6). The Government is satisfied this
measure is justified as a necessary and proportionate means of combatting the
anti-social use of vehicles.
Article 1, Protocol 1 – Right to peaceful enjoyment of property
38.A seizure of a vehicle being used in an anti-social manner is not a permanent
removal. This type of interference is usually considered permitted ‘control of use of
property’ under A1P1(2), rather than ‘deprivation of possessions’. Existing
regulations set out mechanisms by which the legal owner of the vehicle can recover
the seized vehicle.
39.There is a risk that a vehicle could be seized and retained by the police where the
vehicle is not owned by the person committing the offending behaviour. This would
mean adversely affecting the property rights of a third party that is not engaged in
the criminal activity. However, the existing regulations provide safeguards in those
circumstances, as an owner can claim their vehicle back from the police without
charge. Moreover, in those instances the vehicle will often have already been
stolen and the owner will therefore have already been deprived of their vehicle by
the person who stole it. The notification and retrieval process are likely to assist
the lawful owner in reclaiming their vehicle.
Article 6 – Right to a fair trial
40.The initial decision to seize a vehicle will be made by police and not a court and
will be based upon a police constable’s reasonably held belief that a vehicle is
being used in a manner which meets the relevant threshold. The provisions
constitute a forfeiture measure that may adversely affect property rights of third
parties, in the absence of any threat of criminal proceedings against them,
therefore engaging the civil limb of Article 6.
41.Existing regulations set out the requirement to send a seizure notification detailing
the process of returning the vehicle to the legal owner where they can be identified.
The seizure notification is provided to the person who is or appears to be the legal
owner of the vehicle and details the method by which the vehicle can be released.
42.Where an individual using the vehicle in an anti-social manner legally owns the
vehicle, the police will, at the point of seizure, provide the individual with the
reasons why the constable is seeking to seize the vehicle and explain the retrieval
process. The individual may challenge any seizure decision or conduct of the police
10
constable via the usual police complaint channels. They can retrieve their vehicle
by following the retrieval process as notified to them.
43.Where the individual does not legally own the vehicle, they cannot retrieve the
vehicle following the seizure. However, it is not their property and therefore Article
6 is not engaged as there is no determination of their civil rights.
PART 2: OFFENSIVE WEAPONS
Possession of weapon with intent to use unlawful violence etc.
44.Clause 10 creates a new offence for a person to be in possession of a bladed
article or offensive weapon with intent to use the weapon in unlawful violence or to
cause serious unlawful damage to property themselves, or to enable another
person to do so.
Article 8 and Article 1, Protocol 1 – Rights to respect for private and family
life, home and correspondence and peaceful enjoyment of property
45.The police seizure of a weapon may impact the individual’s right to private life
(Article 8) and peaceful enjoyment of their property (A1P1). However, the provision
targets possession with intent to commit ‘unlawful violence’ and ‘unlawful damage
to property’. In the Government’s view, the new measures are necessary and
proportionate to disrupt the long-term trend of an increase in serious violence and
knife crime (the prevention of disorder or crime and the rights and freedoms of
others).
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
46.Article 5 is engaged as the creation of a new criminal offence may result in a
deprivation of liberty. However, it falls within the authorised circumstances
prescribed by Article 5(1) where deprivation is lawful, namely detention after
conviction of a competent court (Article 5(1)(a)). The constituent elements of the
offence and penalties will be set out in primary legislation; the Government is
satisfied the penalties are proportionate to the nature and severity of the offending.
Article 14 – Protection from discrimination (with A1P1)
47.It is possible that the police may arrest and charge persons for the offence in urban
areas (where there is a greater prevalence of knife crime) than in rural areas, which
may impact minority ethnic communities (potentially engaging Article 14, together
with A1P1). The Government’s view is that any such impact, if it materialised, would
be justified; arrest and charge will be dependent on the offence being made out –
and as such, action will only be taken against persons who it can be proved intend
to use the item for unlawful violence or unlawful damage to property (themselves,
or to enable another to do so).
Maximum penalty for offence relating to offensive weapons
11
48.Clause 11 increases the maximum penalty for offences relating to the possession,
sale etc. of offensive weapons and knives and the sale of knives to under 18s from
6 months’ imprisonment or a fine or both to 2 years’ imprisonment or a fine or both.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
49.Any deprivation of liberty arising from a sentence of imprisonment will fall within
the authorised circumstances prescribed by Article 5(1) where deprivation is lawful,
namely detention after conviction of a competent court (Article 5(1)(a)). The
constituent elements of the offence and penalties continue be set out in primary
legislation; the Government is satisfied the penalties are proportionate to the nature
and severity of the offending. The increase in penalties is a necessary deterrent to
disrupt the long-term trend of an increase in serious violence and knife crime (the
prevention of disorder or crime and the rights and freedoms of others).
Power to seize bladed articles etc.
50.Clause 12 provides the police with a power to seize, retain and destroy bladed
articles (any article which has a blade or is sharply pointed), to include those
lawfully held, if the police lawfully encounter such articles in private property and
they have reasonable grounds to suspect that the article is likely to be used in
connection with unlawful violence. Clause 13 makes equivalent provision for the
service police.
Articles 6, 8 and 9 and Article 1, Protocol 1 - Rights to a fair trial, private and
family life, home and correspondence, freedom of thought conscience and
religion and peaceful enjoyment of possessions
51.The provision permits the seizure of bladed articles, which are otherwise lawfully
held, which will interfere with individual’s right to peaceful enjoyment of their
property (A1P1) and may engage with their private life (Article 8). They may also
interfere with individual’s right to freedom of thought, religion and belief (Article 9),
as some bladed articles may be held for religious reasons – such as the Sikh kirpan
(an article of faith which resembles a knife or sword). They may also interfere with
an individual’s right to a fair trial (Article 6) because the decision to seize an item
will be made by the police and not a court.
52.The Government is satisfied the measures are justified as a necessary and
proportionate means of combatting and tackling the continuing increase in knife
crime, by enabling harmful weapons to be seized before unlawful violent acts can
occur (pursuing the legitimate aims of public safety, the prevention of crime and
protecting the health and rights and freedom of others). The Government is
satisfied there is no existing alternative means for the police to intercede before
harm is caused to take custody of items held in private which are likely to be used
for such criminality; this power is therefore necessary to enable the police to
prevent that wider harm occurring. Additionally, where an individual has a “good
reason” for possessing the item (as for example is the defence for possession of
bladed articles in public under the Criminal Justice Act 1988), such as for religious
reasons, it is expected the police will take this into account in determining whether
12
the item is likely to be used in violence (i.e. it de facto is not because its core
purpose in the individual circumstances is for use in religious ceremonies).
53.Additionally, the legislation contains safeguards to ensure the power is exercised
in a proportionate way: critically, the threshold test for seizure and destruction is
reasonable grounds for suspecting that the article would be likely to be used in
connection with unlawful violence if it were not seized (which requires evidence,
which may be challenged in any prosecution, as to intended unlawful use); the
police will be required to give the individual a notice stating the reason why the
relevant article was seized; and appeal routes are available (both to the police
through their complaints processes and to a magistrates’ court) which may result
in the item being returned if wrongfully seized. Where the individual has a “good
reason” for possessing the item (such as for religious reasons), the police will take
this into account in their determination of whether they have reasonable grounds
to suspect that the item will be used to commit unlawful violence if not seized.
These safeguards also ensure compliance with the civil limb of Article 6; the
individual may challenge the seizure of the item through the complaints processes
and to the magistrates’ court.
Article 14 – Protection from discrimination
54.As to Article 14, it is possible that the police will seize bladed articles from premises
in urban areas (where there is a greater prevalence of knife crime) more frequently
than from rural areas, which may impact minority ethnic communities. The
Government is satisfied the legislation has sufficient safeguards to mitigate
disproportionate application. Seizure can only take place where there are
reasonable grounds for suspecting that the relevant article is likely to be used in
connection with unlawful violence; as such, the basis for the seizure is reasonable
suspicion as to use in criminality, not an individual’s protected characteristics.

PART 3: RETAIL CRIME
Assault of retail workers: offence and duty to make a criminal behaviour order
55.Clause 14 will create a new offence of assaulting a retail worker whist at work. The
clauses define “a retail worker” and “retail premises”. The offence is punishable on
summary conviction to imprisonment for a term not exceeding the maximum term
for summary offences or to a fine (or both).
56.Clause 15 imposes a duty on the court to make a criminal behaviour order (“CBO”)
where a person has been convicted of an assault retail worker, unless the court is
of the opinion that there are exceptional circumstances which relate to the offence
or the offender which justify not making an order.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
57.Article 5 is engaged as the creation of a new criminal offence may result in a
deprivation of liberty. However, it falls within the authorised circumstances
prescribed by Article 5(1) where deprivation is lawful, namely detention after
13
conviction of a competent court (Article 5(1)(a)). The constituent elements of the
offence and penalties will be set out in primary legislation; the Government is
satisfied the penalties are proportionate to the nature and severity of the offending.
58.Upon conviction of this offence there is a presumption that the court will impose a
CBO if the court does not impose a custodial sentence or make a youth
rehabilitation order, community order or a suspended sentence. The court must
make a CBO unless there are exceptional circumstances which (i) relate to the
offence or the offender, and (ii) justify not making the CBO or, (iii) the court makes
an application for absolute discharge under s79 in respect of the offences. As such
the court will still have discretion to not impose a CBO, but the presumption is that
an order will be made if applied for. The presumption does not interfere with or
fetter the Prosecutor’s decision as to whether or not it is appropriate to apply for a
CBO, and for an application to be made the Prosecutor will still have to be satisfied
that the defendant has engaged in behaviour that has caused or is likely to cause
harassment alarm or distress, and that they consider that making an order will help
in preventing the offender from engaging in such behaviour (s331(2)).
59.There are no mandatory prohibitions or requirements that are to be imposed under
a CBO, as such the court continue to have flexibility as to what is proportionate
(and must act compatibly with the ECHR, including Art 5, when determining which
prohibitions or requirements are to be imposed). It is not assessed that the
imposition of such conditions (which could, for example, include geographical
restrictions or curfews) would amount to a deprivation of liberty; they would be
mere restrictions on liberty. As such, the measure is considered compatible with
Article 5 of the ECHR.
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
60.The presumption in favour of imposing a CBO on conviction may, indirectly, engage
Article 8: a CBO may impose prohibitions or requirements on an individual, such
as geographical restrictions, which may interfere with an individual’s private or
family life. The Government is satisfied that any such conditions imposed (at the
discretion of the Court) will be a justified and proportionate interference with the
rights, in pursuit of the legitimate aims of public safety or economic wellbeing of the
country or the prevention of disorder or crime, or the protection of rights and
freedoms of others. The legislative aim of the measure is to prevent violent retail
crime; and prohibitions and requirements will be targeted at that aim (such as, for
e.g., prohibiting an individual from attending the shop where the assault took
place). The statutory regime for imposition of a CBO (including pursuant to this
presumption) are clearly prescribed by law (set out in primary legislation. As such,
it is considered the measure is compatible with Article 8.
Theft from shop triable either way irrespective of value of goods
14
61.Clause 16 provides for the abolition of low-value shoplifting as a summary only
offence. This provision repeals s.22A of the Magistrates’ Court Act 1980. The result
is that low-value shoplifting of goods worth £200 or less, which would previously
have been treated as a summary-only offence unless the defendant elected trial in
the Crown Court, will now in all cases be treated as the either-way offence of theft,
contrary to section 1 of the Theft Act 1968. The maximum penalty will therefore be
one of 7 years’ imprisonment, rather than the six months’ maximum penalty for the
summary-only offence. The measure potentially engages Article 5 ECHR.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
62.While setting a maximum penalty generally falls outside the scope of the
Convention, raising the maximum penalty for low-value shoplifting could potentially
engage Article 5. A sentencing court in England and Wales must follow any relevant
sentencing guidelines unless satisfied that it would be contrary to the interests of
justice to do so. Irrespective of whether the offence is treated as a summary-only
offence or an either-way offence, the applicable sentencing guidelines remain the
Theft from a Shop or Stall sentencing guidelines. The Government therefore is
satisfied that this measure is compatible with Article 5 ECHR because the change
in maximum penalty will not give rise to the potential for a disproportionately severe
sentence, since the sentence will result from an assessment of the factors set out
in the sentencing guideline.
PART 4: CRIMINAL EXPLOITATION OF CHILDREN AND OTHERS
Child Criminal Exploitation – Offence and consequential amendments
63.Clause 17 introduces a new offence of child criminal exploitation (“CCE”). It will be
an offence where an adult does an act to or in respect of a child, with the intention
of causing the child to engage in criminal activity (at any time), and either the child
is under the age of 13, or the child is under the age of 18 and the adult does not
reasonably believe that the child is aged 18 or over. The offence is an either way
offence, subject to a maximum penalty of 10 years’ imprisonment or an unlimited
fine (or both). Clause 35 makes consequential amendments to the Proceeds of
Crime Act 2002 and the Youth Justice and Criminal Evidence Act 1999 in relation
to protection of witnesses and lifestyle offences.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
64.Article 5 is engaged as the creation of a new criminal offence of CCE may result in
a deprivation of liberty. However, it falls within the authorised circumstances
prescribed by Article 5(1) where deprivation is lawful, namely detention after
conviction of a competent court (Article 5(1)(a)). The constituent elements of the
offence and penalties will be set out in primary legislation; the Government is
satisfied the penalties are proportionate to the nature and severity of the offending.
The procedural safeguards required by Article 5(2) to (4) will be assured through
the ordinary procedure of the criminal justice system.
15
Article 6- Right to fair trial
65.Article 6 is engaged as the creation of a new criminal offence of CCE may result in
a criminal trial, and in particular because where the act relates to a child under 13,
it need not be proved that the adult reasonably believed that the child was under
18. There are two core elements to the offence: (a) an act being done to or in
respect of a person with the intention of causing them to engage in criminal activity;
and (b) that person is a child. As to the second element, the offence will be made
out automatically where the child is under the age of 13 (i.e. on strict liability); or
where the child is under 18, where the adult does not reasonably believe that the
child is aged 18 or over.
66.The Government is satisfied that strict liability as to age where the child is under
13 is justified and Article 6 compliant. Strict liability is not in itself incompatible with
Article 64
, nor is its imposition incompatible with the presumption of innocence. The
House of Lords in G5 confirmed this and the more general proposition that Article
6(2) does not affect the substance of the matters which may be legitimately
proscribed by the content of the criminal law (provided that the burden of proving
the matters selected for proscription is on the prosecution). Similarly, the ECtHR
has held presumptions of fact or of law operate in every criminal-law system and
are not prohibited in principle by the Convention (Falk v. the Netherlands6
),
provided they are confined within reasonable limits which strike a balance between
the importance of what is at stake and the rights of the defence; any interference
must be reasonably proportionate to the legitimate aim sought to be achieved
(Janovic v. Sweden7
; Salabiaku v. France8
). The Government is satisfied any
interference is justified to protect an extremely vulnerable cohort of victims – young
children. It is confined within reasonable limits (i.e. 13 and under) that consider the
objectives of the offence (to protect children from criminal exploitation) and the
protection of the defendant’s rights (strict liability is only one part of the offence;
proof of intent to encourage the child to criminality is also required). Moreover, the
burden will always be on the prosecution to prove that the child was under 13
beyond reasonable doubt.
67.Adding CCE as a criminal lifestyle offence in POCA 2002 may also engage a
person’s Article 6 rights (right to fair trial) as section 10 of POCA provides that a
number of assumptions are to be made by the court in determining the benefit from
criminal conduct during confiscation proceedings. The criminal lifestyle
assumptions require the defendant to account for the last six years of financial
activity, to prove that it does not represent benefit from crime. There is no discretion
to disapply these provisions under the existing law. However, the Government is
satisfied that any interference is justified. There are currently two ways in which the
4 Muhamad [2002] EWCA Crim 1856; Barnfather v Islington Education Authority [2003] EWHC 418
(Admin)
5
[2008] UKHL 37
6 Application No. 66273/01
7 Application No. 34619/97
8 Application no. 10519/83
16
defendant may seek to disapply the criminal lifestyle assumptions: by adducing
evidence to demonstrate that the application of an assumption would be wrong,
and by demonstrating that the application of an assumption would lead to a serious
risk of injustice (section 10(6)(b) of POCA). Whilst case law has interpreted section
10(6)(b) narrowly, assumptions by way of reverse burden have long been held to
be a “fair and proportionate response to the need to protect the public interest.” (R
v Benjafield9
) and not to constitute an unlawful interference with Article 6(1).
Moreover, there is further provision in this Bill to ensure that the serious risk of
injustice test is not construed unduly narrowly (see paragraph 3 of Schedule 14 to
the Bill), and that the criminal lifestyle assumptions will only apply if the court is
asked to apply them by the prosecutor (see paragraph 2 of Schedule 14 to the Bill).
Article 8 - Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
68.Article 8 may be engaged as the creation of a new offence of CCE may constitute
an interference with a person’s Article 8 rights to a private and family life, in so far
as it criminalises a wide range of acts done by an adult, which may occur in the
course of their private and /or family life. The Government is satisfied that any
interference is justified as it will be in accordance with the law (prescribed in primary
legislation); necessary for the prevention of disorder and crime (as it seeks to
criminalise persons who deliberately target children to commit criminality); and is
proportionate (as the actus reus is sufficiently restricted by the mens rea – the
intention of causing the child to engage in criminal activity).
Article 8 and Article 1, Protocol 1 – Rights to private and family life, home
and correspondence and peaceful enjoyment of property
69.Adding CCE as a criminal lifestyle offence in POCA 2002 engages the Article 1
Protocol 1 right of the offender (and potentially of third parties) and potentially
Article 8 (due to the significant overlap between the scope of A1P1 and Article 8,
since the concept of “home” under the latter provision might fall within the concept
of “property” under the former). The orders require offenders to divest themselves
of interests in property (including money) so that they may pay a sum equivalent in
value to their benefit from crime. The Government is satisfied that any such
interference is justified as the purpose of the confiscation regime is fundamentally,
to deprive offenders of the benefit of crime. As such, inclusion of the offence may
be justified in the same way that other criminal lifestyle offences may be justified.
Child Criminal Exploitation Prevention Orders
70.Clauses 18 to 30 and Schedule 4 make provision for Child Criminal Exploitation
Prevention Orders (“CCEPO”). These are new civil preventative orders which may
be imposed on an adult (person aged 18+) by the criminal court dealing with an
individual at the end of criminal proceedings, or by a magistrates court “on
application” by law enforcement bodies.
9
[2002] UKHL 2, [2003] 1 AC 1099 at [8] (Lord Steyn)
17
71.To impose a CCEPO, the court must be satisfied that:
a) either (a) the individual is convicted for a CCE offence (or found not guilty
by reason of insanity, or to be under a disability but to have done the act
charged against them, in respect of such offence); or (b) on the balance of
probabilities that the individual has engaged in conduct associated with
causing children to engage in criminal conduct; and
b) there is a risk that the defendant will seek to cause children, or any particular
children, from being caused to engage in criminal conduct; and
c) the order is necessary to protect children from that risk.
72.A CCEPO may only include prohibitions or requirements which are necessary for
the purpose of protecting children from engaging in criminal conduct. The order will
be tailored to the specific circumstances of each case. Such prohibitions may
include, for example, not being in a particular place, not being with particular
persons or not participating in particular activities. The requirements may include,
for example, attending at a particular place at a particular time. A condition requiring
notification of the individual’s name and address, and change of name and
address, to the police may also be imposed, at the Court’s discretion (“the
notification condition”).
73.The Court may impose a “full” CCEPO or, where a hearing is adjourned, an
“interim” CCEPO. A without notice application may be made, but only an interim
CCEPO may be imposed following such application – and an interim order may
only be made where the court thinks it necessary to do so.
74.In relation to CCEPOs:
a) the person concerned (and others) may apply to vary or discharge an order;
b) the person concerned (and others in certain circumstances) may appeal the
making, variation or discharge of an order;
c) a “full” CCEPO has a mandatory minimum duration of at least 5 years (
where it is made on conviction) or 2 years (in all other cases), but may be
discharged prior to that date with the consent of the person concerned and
a relevant chief officer of police;
d) where the person concerned is required to comply with the limited
notification condition, notification of false information (knowingly) is an
offence (with a maximum penalty of 5 years imprisonment, or a fine, or both);
e) breach of an order without reasonable excuse is an offence (with a
maximum penalty of 5 years imprisonment, or a fine, or both).
75.The CCEPO is not a penalty10. The legislative aim is the protection of children from
being exploited by criminal gangs and to prevent adults from harming children by
drawing them into a world of criminality. It does not operate to punish, and the
10 See Welch v United Kingdom (17740/90)
18
prohibitions and requirements are statutorily confined to those “necessary” for
protective and preventative purposes.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
76.Article 5 is concerned with the deprivation of liberty and not with mere restrictions
on freedom of movement. The provision gives the court discretion to impose
prohibitions and/or positive requirements on an individual. But, if doing so, the court
may only impose prohibitions or requirements restricting an individual’s
movements (e.g. curfew, attendance at a particular location, geographical
restrictions) not those amounting to the kind of arbitrary detention proscribed by
Article 5. The ECtHR has held, in (Guzzardi v Italy11), that the difference between
restriction on movement and deprivation of liberty is a matter of degree not
substance and account must be taken of a wide range of factors including: type,
duration, effect and manner of implementation. The domestic courts have held, in
individual cases, that no deprivation of liberty arose from a control order imposing
a curfew alongside other restrictions on conduct12. Accordingly, the Government is
of the view that the provisions are compatible with Article 5 as the Court may only
impose restrictions of a degree and intensity only amounting to a restriction on
movement13
.
77.Article 5 is also engaged as breach of a CCEPO, and notification of false
information, are criminal offences which can result in the arrest and detention of an
individual. The applicable power of arrest lies in section 24 of the Police and
Criminal Evidence Act 1984. The penalty for the offences is set out in the
legislation; the Government is satisfied the penalties are proportionate to the nature
and severity of the offending. Consequently, the penalty and power of arrest are
in accordance with a procedure prescribed by law and fall within the permissible
grounds in Article 5(1), namely: the lawful detention of a person after conviction
(Article 5(1)(a)); the lawful arrest or detention of a person for non-compliance with
the lawful order of a court (Article 5(1)(b); and the lawful arrest or detention of a
person effected for the purpose of bringing him or her before the competent legal
authority on reasonable suspicion of having committed an offence (Article 5(1)(c).
The protections provided for by Article 5(3) in respect of arrest are met and offender
subject to the order is able to appeal against conviction and sentence.
Article 6 – Right to fair trial
78.In relation to Article 6, the Government is satisfied that the proceedings where a
CCEPO may be imposed, varied, or discharged satisfy fair trial requirements within
the civil limb of Article 6. The rules which govern the procedure for making of an
order (on application or at the end of criminal proceedings) ensure participation of
the person concerned in the court process (including by the availability of legal aid
11 [1980] ECHR 5,
12 Secretary of State for the Home Department v E [2007] UKHL 47, [2008] 1 A.C. 499, [2007] 10
WLUK 803
13 See, e.g. De Tommaso v Italy; Guzzardi v Italy; Medvedyev and Others v. France; Creanga v
Romania
19
and rights of legal representation) and a fair and public hearing within a reasonable
time by an independent and impartial tribunal.
79.The Government is satisfied that the proceedings for the making or variation (etc.)
of a CCPEO do not amount to a criminal charge for the purposes of Article 6(2)
and (3)14. Crucially, the legislative aim underpinning CCEPOs is the prevention of
CCE not the punishment of perpetrators, as assured via the statutory conditions.
Applying the established three-part test in Engel v Netherlands15: (1) the domestic
classification of the proceedings are civil; (2) the essential nature of the
proceedings is also civil (a conviction / finding of guilt is not a precondition for
CCEPO: even for “on conviction” orders it is simply a gateway criterion and the
court must additionally be satisfied that there is a future risk of CCE and the order
is necessary to prevent that risk16); and (3) the nature and severity of the
consequences that may flow from the proceedings are the imposition of
prohibitions or requirements relating to the individual’s conduct, for the preventative
purpose. Whilst these may, for example, include curfews, supervision
requirements, contact restrictions or geographic restrictions, they are not
comparable with a criminal sanction17 and can be no more restrictive than are
judged necessary to achieve the preventative object of the order18
.
80.The Government is, accordingly, satisfied that the use of the civil standard of proof
(balance of probabilities) does not violate Article 6 of the ECHR (notwithstanding
that breach of an order is a criminal offence). In Jones v Birmingham City Council
the Supreme Court held Article 6(1) does not require the criminal standard of proof
to be satisfied in analogous civil preventative orders (gang injunctions) and the
ECtHR has similarly held that while Article 6 guarantees the right to a fair hearing,
it does not lay down any rules on the admissibility of evidence or the way it should
be assessed (Saliba v Malta)
19. The existence of prescribed rights of appeal, and
the ability to subsequently apply to the court to vary or discharge the order, afford
further safeguards. As such, the Government is satisfied that the provision is
compatible with Article 6 and adequate safeguards exist to ensure procedural
fairness.
81. The provision for interim CCEPOs to be imposed following a without notice
application is also considered compatible with Article 6. The procedure
incorporates adequate safeguards to protect the interests of the potential subject
of the order and, so far as possible, complies with the requirement to provide
14 See, by analogy, McCann v Chief Constable of Manchester [2002] UHL 39; Gough v Chief
Constable of Derbyshire Constabulary [2001] All ER (D) and Jones v Birmingham City Council Court
of Appeal: [2018] EWCA Civ 1189.
15
 (1979-80) 1 EHRR 647; explained in domestic terms in Gale v Serious Organised Crime Agency
[2011] 2 WLR 2760.
16 Benham v United Kingdom (Application no. 19380/92). Guzzardi v Italy (1981) 3 EHRR 333,
paragraphs 82 to 83; Ozturk v. Germany (Application No. 8544/79).
17 Tommaso v Italy [2017] ECHR 205 in which the Grand Chamber at [143] confirmed that special
supervision was not comparable to a criminal sanction.
18 Secretary of State for the Home Department v MB [2007] UKHL 46
19 (Application No 24221/13) [2016] ECHR 1058 at para 67.
20
adversarial proceedings and equality of arms: only an interim order may be
imposed following a without notice application; the court would only impose such
an interim order, after a without notice hearing, where it considers it “necessary to
do so. In making that assessment, the Court will be required to consider the
necessity of the order and any prohibitions contained in it and balance the need to
take protective action against the need to limit interference with the potential
subject of the orders rights20. An interim order may only impose prohibitions (with
the limited exception of the notification condition); and the subject of the order may
appeal against its making or make an application to vary or discharge the interim
order. In practice, without notice applications will only be made (and consequently
without notice interim orders imposed) in exceptional or urgent situations, such as
where an immediate risk to specific or general children is present and where
serving notice would cause unacceptable delay or risk the defendant absconding
or causing imminent harm to potential victims or witnesses. It is considered,
therefore, that the Article 6(1) right to a fair hearing is adequately protected.
82.Breach of a CCEPO, and notification of false information (where the notification
condition is imposed), amounts to a criminal offence, punishable on conviction to
a maximum term of imprisonment of five years or a fine (or both). Proceedings
taken in respect of these offences acre criminal in character under domestic law
and constitute a ‘criminal charge’ for the purposes of Article 6. The usual processes
and appeal routes apply as for criminal proceedings, and the Government is
satisfied that existing safeguards for criminal court hearing meet the criminal limb
of Article 6. The Government is therefore satisfied that the processes fully respect
Article 6 right.
Articles 8, 9, 10 and 11 – Rights to respect for private and family life, home
and correspondence, freedom of thought, conscience and religion, freedom
of expression and freedom of assembly and association
83.A CCEPO may impose such prohibitions or requirements, including the notification
condition, as it considers necessary for the purpose of protecting children
generally, or any particular children, from being caused to engage in criminal
behaviour. Depending on their content, the prohibitions or requirements imposed
may engage Articles 8 (e.g. prohibiting attending particularly localities or contacting
or residing with particular children, which may interfere with private or family life);
Article 9 (e.g. prohibition entering particular locations or being at particular
locations, which may interfere with abilities to attend a place of worship); Article 10
(e.g. prohibiting use of particular means of social media or use of the internet, which
may interfere with freedom of expression); and/or Article 11 (e.g. imposing a curfew
requirement of making non-association provision, which may interfere with
freedom of assembly or association).
84.These are qualified rights. The Government is satisfied that any interference which
arises will be in accordance with the law, in pursuance of a legitimate aim and
proportionate. The interferences (the prohibitions/requirements) will be in
20 By analogy see R v R [2104] EWFC 48; and DS v AC [2023] EWFC 46.
21
accordance with the law as there will be clear provision in primary legislation
governing the basis on which the court may make an order. These are formulated
with sufficient precision to enable a person to know in what circumstances and the
purpose, and intended extent to which, the powers can be exercised. Statutory
safeguards exist to ensure any interference is necessary and proportionate. The
measures must be necessary for the purpose of protecting children from being
caused to engage in criminal behaviour (which will mitigate risks of children being
encouraged to commit criminality, but also the harm (physical and psychological)
caused to children by the means of exploitation such as use of violence, threats,
coercion, manipulation (such as befriending and grooming) and debt-bondage),
which reflects the legitimate aims of public safety, the prevention of crime and
protecting the rights and freedoms of others. The Court, in exercising its discretion
as to whether to impose prohibitions or requirements, must ensure any conditions
imposed are proportionate. The Court is, additionally, specifically required to take
into account any potential conflict with the times at which the defendant normally
attends work or an educational establishment, or conflict with their religious beliefs,
or compliance with any other court order or injunction (for example, there could be
an exception to a “curfew” provision to allow attendance at work or college
environment or religious attendance). These protections will ensure that any
CCEPO is proportionate.
85.The Government is satisfied the mandatory minimum duration of CCEPOs, being
2 years or 5 years, is compatible with Articles 8, 9, 10 and 11. This is proportionate
to the serious harm caused by CCE, the inherent vulnerability of children and likely
duration required before potential victims reach maturity and the intimidation,
manipulation and coercive control frequently involved in CCE. The longer duration,
5 years, only applies where an individual has been convicted of an offence.
Safeguards exist to ensure that any duration does not exceed that which is
proportionate: the Court has flexibility as to which specific prohibitions or
requirements apply for the mandatory duration, and it is possible for an order to be
discharged before the end of that term (upon application) with the consent of the
subject of the order and a relevant chief officer of police.
Controlling another’s home for criminal purposes
86.Clause 32 creates a new offence of controlling another’s home for criminal
purposes (“cuckooing”). It will be an offence to exercise control over the dwelling
of another person, for the purpose of enabling the dwelling to be used in connection
with the commission of a relevant offence without the person’s consent. The
relevant offences are listed in Schedule 5 (which may be amended by regulations).
Clause 35 makes consequential amendments to the POCA 2002, the YJCEA 1999
and the Criminal Evidence (Northern Ireland) Order 1999.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
87.The creation of a new criminal offence could result in an individual’s arrest and/or
imprisonment and therefore deprivation of their liberty (Article 5). However the
measures fall within the permissible grounds in Article 5(1)(a) and (c) of the ECHR
22
namely, the lawful detention of persons after conviction by a competent court and
the lawful arrest or detention of a person effected for the purpose of bringing them
before the competent legal authority on reasonable suspicion of having committed
an offence. The Government is satisfied the penalties are proportionate to the
nature and severity of the offending. The procedural safeguards required by Article
5(2) to (4) will be assured through the ordinary procedures of the criminal justice
system. As such, the Government is satisfied the measures are compatible with
Article 5.
Article 6 – Right to a fair trial
88.The Government is satisfied the measures comply with the criminal limb of Article
6, in particular that strict liability as to lack of consent is justified on the basis that
requiring a Defendant’s knowledge or belief as to consent (or lack thereof) would
not adequately protect victims against cuckooing, who are often vulnerable and
subject to coercion or intimidation.
89.Strict liability is not in itself incompatible Article 6 of the ECHR (Muhamad;
Barnfather v Islington Education Authority (ibid)). Nor is its imposition incompatible
with the presumption of innocence enshrined in Article 6(2) of the ECHR. The
ECtHR has held that presumptions of fact or law operate in every criminal law
system and are not prohibited in principle by the Convention (Falk), provided they
are confined within reasonable limits which strike a balance between the
importance of what is at stake and the rights of the defendant. The Government is
satisfied that an appropriate balance has been struck between the harms caused
by cuckooing and the defendant’s rights under Article 6. In particular, the
prosecution will need to prove beyond reasonable doubt that the victim did not
consent to the control of their property and that the defendant intended to control
the property for criminal purposes. The usual safeguards applicable to persons
arrested, prosecuted and/or sentenced for an offence will apply.
90.Adding cuckooing as a criminal lifestyle offence in POCA, and the provision of
special measures protections for victims of cuckooing, may engage a person’s
Article 6 rights on the same basis as outlined (above) in relation to CCE. The
analysis is the same, and the Government is satisfied the provisions Article 6
compliant.
Article 8 and Article 1 Protocol 1 – Rights to private and family life, home and
correspondence and peaceful enjoyment of property
91.Including cuckooing as a criminal lifestyle offence in POCA 2002 engages the
Article 1 Protocol 1 right of the offender (and potentially of third parties) and
potentially Article 8. On the same basis as outlined for CCE (above), we consider
any such interference is justified as the purpose of the confiscation regime is
fundamentally, to deprive offenders of the benefit of crime.
PART 5: SEXUAL OFFENCES AND OFFENDERS
23
Child Sexual abuse image-generators
92.Clause 36 introduces a new criminal offence in relation to fine-tuned AI models
designed to produce child sexual abuse material (“CSAM”). This targets child
sexual abuse (“CSA”) offenders using and sharing bespoke add-ons or files which
can be applied to mainstream AI models to create tailored and illegal images of
children, by making it an offence to make, supply, offer to supply or possess a CSA
image generator. The images are not necessarily photorealistic but may be
drawings etc. The maximum penalty for the offence is five years’ imprisonment.
Articles 5 and 6 – Rights to liberty and security and a fair trial
93.The ECHR articles engaged by this provision are Articles 5 and 6, as the measure
may result in criminal prosecution for the offence and detention following arrest,
charge or conviction. The Government is satisfied, for the same reason as outlined
above in relation to other new offences, this is compatible with Articles 5 and 6.
Possession of advice or guidance about creating CSA images
94.Clause 37 makes it a criminal offence to possess guidance on creating synthetic
or partially synthetic CSAM. There are guides circulating which provide offenders
with instructions on creating artificial CSAM, including creating images of specific
children, and on how to use AI to “nudify” images of children to carry out “sextortion”
(financially motivated sexual extortion); this offence targets those guides. The
maximum sentence for the offence is three year’s imprisonment on conviction on
indictment.
Articles 5 and 6 – Rights to liberty and security and a fair trial
95.The ECHR articles engaged by this provision are Articles 5 and 6, as the measure
may result in criminal prosecution for the offence and detention following arrest,
charge or conviction. The Government is satisfied, for the same reason as outlined
above in relation to other new offences, this is compatible with Articles 5 and 6.
Article 1 Protocol 1 – Right to peaceful enjoyment of property
96.Article 1 Protocol 1 is also engaged as the existing power for forfeiture of advice
and guidance about abusing children and taking indecent photographs of children
is extended to items giving guidance or advice about making synthetic images of
children. Forfeiture and confiscation are generally considered permitted ‘control of
property’ under Article 1(2), rather than ‘deprivation of possessions’, additionally
Schedule 1 to the Protection of Children Act 1978 which is extended to apply to
these items allows a third party to give notice of a claim to the property and requires
confirmation by a court that the property is forfeitable property and that it cannot
be severed from other property. The Government therefore is satisfied that any
interference is justified and compatible with A1P1; the advice and guidance is
illegal and relates to illegal activity (CSA).
24
Online facilitation of child sexual exploitation and abuse
97.Clause 38 makes it a criminal offence to administer or moderate a CSA website or
private group. The NCA assess that it is almost certain that the vast majority of
CSA is underpinned by networking between offenders, facilitated by dedicated
websites and groups on both the dark and clear web which are run and promoted
by moderators and administrators. This offence targets them. The maximum
sentence on conviction is 10 years imprisonment.
Articles 5 and 6 – Rights to liberty and security and a fair trial
98.The ECHR articles engaged by this provision are Articles 5 and 6. Articles 5 and 6
are engaged as the measure may result in criminal prosecution for the offence and
detention following arrest, charge or conviction. The Government is satisfied, for
the same reasons as outlined above in relation to other new offences, this is
compatible with Articles 5 and 6.
Sexual activity in the presence of child etc
99.Clause 42 will amend the offences set out in sections 11, 18, 32, 36 and 40 of the
Sexual Offences Act 2003 which criminalise sexual activity in the presence of a
child or a person with a mental disorder (or where the child or person is in a place
from which the perpetrator can be observed), in certain circumstances.
100. A common element of the existing offences is the requirement that for the
purposes of obtaining sexual gratification, the defendant (A) was engaged in sexual
activity with the knowledge or belief that the child or person with a mental disorder
(B) was aware, or with the intention that they should be aware, that A was engaging
in sexual activity. The clause amends the existing offences to remove this
requirement. The proposed amendments engage Articles 5, 7 and 8.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
101. The penalties for the offences will remain unchanged by the amendments and
are set out in primary legislation. As such they are in accordance with a procedure
prescribed by law and would fall within the permissible grounds in Article 5(1). The
defendant will be able to appeal against conviction and the resulting sentence in
the usual ways. The amendments are therefore compatible with Article 5.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
102. Article 7 provides that a punishment cannot be imposed other than where it is
prescribed by law. The elements of the existing offences, and the maximum penalty
for each offence, will continue to be clearly set out in a way in which a member of
the public can understand. The amendments will not have any retrospective effect.
The amendments are therefore compatible with Article 7.
Article 8 - Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
25
103. Article 8 - which protects the right to respect for family and private life - is
engaged. The existing offences are listed in Schedule 3 to the SOA 2003, meaning
that where the criteria are met, an offender will be made subject to notification
requirements in accordance with Part 2 - which require offenders to notify the police
of various personal details on an annual basis as well as whenever these details
change, including: name, address, date of birth, passport and national insurance
number
104. The broadening of the existing offences means that some acts of sexual activity
in the presence of a child or person with a mental disorder that are not currently
captured by the criminal law will be, once the amendments are commenced,
notification requirements will be imposed in some cases where currently they
cannot be.
105. Any interference with an offender’s Article 8 rights is justified in accordance with
Article 8(2). The amended offences will retain the requirement that the prosecution
must prove a link between A acting “for the purpose of obtaining sexual
gratification” and the presence or observation of B. As such, there is a clear and
rational connection between the offences and the objectives of the notification
requirements such that the imposition of notification requirements in these
circumstances is a proportionate means of achieving a legitimate aim.
Child sex offences: Grooming aggravating factor
106. Clause 43 creates a statutory aggravating factor that applies when sentencing
specified sexual offences which are committed against a child. A court must treat
an offence as aggravated by grooming if the offence was facilitated by or involved
the offender grooming a person aged under 18, or the offence was facilitated by,
or involved, a person other than the offender grooming a person aged 18 and the
offender knew, or could reasonably have known, about the grooming when the
offence was committed. The measure potentially engages Article 5, Article 7 and
Article 14, together with Article 5.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
107. While the new statutory aggravating factor may result in longer periods of
imprisonment for certain offenders, any such additional imprisonment will follow
the conviction by a competent court in accordance with Article 5§(1)(a). Further,
the ultimate sentence length will be set lawfully by the sentencing court based on
an individualised assessment of the relevant aggravating and mitigating factors in
a manner that ensures that the detention will not be arbitrary.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
108. This measure has retrospective effect as the changes are to apply to those
persons who may have committed offences before commencement but who have
not yet been charged, convicted or sentenced. Article 7 is not breached as the
maximum penalty for the offences that may be imposed before and after
26
commencement is unaffected, in compliance with the principles in Coeme and
Others v Belgium (2000) and R v Uttley [2004] UKHL 38. For these reasons, the
Government is satisfied that this measure to be compatible with Article 7.
Article 14 – Protection from discrimination
109. With respect to Article 14, together with Article 5, a claim could be brought on
the basis that an offender being sentenced prior to the introduction of the statutory
aggravating factor could have received a lesser custodial sentence than one
sentenced after commencement of the measure, despite having committed a
similar offence at a similar point in time. However, domestic courts and the ECtHR
have consistently rejected Article 14 challenges put on the basis that offenders may
or would have been subject to lesser sentences had they been sentenced at a
different time when a different regime applied: R v Docherty (Shaun) [2016] UKSC
62; Minter v UK [2017] 5 WLUK 8.
Power to scan for child sexual abuse images at the border
110. Clause 44 creates a power for Border Force to require the unlocking of digital
devices, with a criminal penalty for refusing to do so, and engages the right to fair
trial and the privilege against self-incrimination under Article 6, the right to privacy
under Article 8, and the right to the peaceful enjoyment of one’s property under
Article 1 of the First Protocol (“A1P1”) to the Convention. The Government is
satisfied that this new power is a necessary and proportionate limitation on these
rights and is narrowly tailored to address a grave social evil.
Articles 6, 8 and Article 1 Protocol 1– Rights to a fair trial, private and family
life, home and correspondence and peaceful enjoyment of property
111. The right to fair trial is engaged under Article 6 ECHR. This power puts a
traveller to a choice: either unlock their device for scanning, or face arrest for
obstruction. It may be said that this deprives them of the right not to self-incriminate
by unlocking the device. The right not to incriminate oneself is recognised under
Article 6. However, the Government would emphasise that the privilege against
self-incrimination does not extend to the use in criminal proceedings of material
which may be obtained from the accused through recourse to compulsory powers,
such as the power to direct unlocking, but which has an existence independent of
the will of the suspect21
.
112. The Government also emphasises the fact that the initial decision to direct
unlocking will be made by an official having “reasonable grounds” to suspect the
presence on the device of child sexual abuse material which is already logged by
law enforcement on a special database. The Government is satisfied that there are
sufficient safeguards to meet the requirements of Article 6: the officer may not
require unlocking without reasonable grounds which requires sufficient evidence
and/or intelligence on which such grounds can be made out. Similarly, the
21 Saunders v. the United Kingdom, (1997) 23 E.H.R.R. 313 § 69; see also O'Halloran and Francis v.
the United Kingdom (2008) 46 EHRR 21. § 47.
27
obstruction offence is limited to situations where a traveller refuses to unlock
“without reasonable excuse.” Therefore, the Government is satisfied that this
measure is compatible with Article 6.
113. Article 8 ECHR is also engaged as the power will allow officers to scan devices
for material that a traveller will likely regard as private. The Government is satisfied,
though, that this is a proportionate interference in pursuit of the legitimate aim of
“the prevention of disorder or crime, for the protection of health or morals, or for
the protection of the rights and freedoms of others” under Article 8(2). Interference
for one of these purposes must be made in accordance with law and must be
“necessary in a democratic society.” This power is aimed squarely at the prevention
of crime and is necessary to secure the welfare of the nation’s children, a
fundamental responsibility of any democratic government.
114. As digital devices may also be seized after this power has been used, it also
engages A1P1 namely the right to the peaceful enjoyment of one’s possessions. A
person would be deprived of their digital devices under this power if the scan
confirms the presence of illegal material on the device, or in a situation where the
traveller refuses to unlock it. The Government is confident that seizure in light of a
positive scan or obstruction is overwhelmingly “in the public interest”, as seizure is
essential for further investigation of the contents of the device. Seizure will also be
“subject to the conditions provided for by law”, as the owner of the device will be
afforded all the protections afforded other suspects who are detained under
customs powers and subsequently by the police. The Government is confident that
there are “no general principles of international law” which bar seizure of an
unlocked device known to contain this kind of illegal material or a locked device
which is reasonably suspected to contain this material.
Duty to report child sexual abuse
115. Chapter 2 of Part 5 requires a person, aged 18 years or over, who is involved
in regulated activity relating to children in England, to report child sexual abuse to
the police or social services. A person who fails to report is at risk of being barred
from working with children. It is a criminal offence for a person to prevent or deter
another person from reporting.
Article 8 – Right to private and family life, home and correspondence
116. A person who is subject to the duty (a ‘relevant individual’) would have to reveal
very private information about a victim to either the police or social services, even
where the victim does not want the abuse to be reported. This interferes with the
victim’s right to private life. The private life of an alleged perpetrator is also
impacted, as information about them would be reported to the police or social
services. There may be circumstances where the alleged perpetrator has a
reasonable expectation of privacy when they confess to a relevant individual who
they have a close relationship with.
28
117. The Government is satisfied the interference with Article 8 is justified as the
duty is intended to combat child sexual abuse, and so is in pursuit of the legitimate
aims of preventing crime and protecting the health, rights and freedoms of others.
It has resulted from a recommendation of the Independent Inquiry into Child Sexual
Abuse (IICSA)22 which identified a serious problem with the protection of children
and many past instances of failures to take action in response to child abuse.
118. It is considered proportionate for a report to be made even where the victim
does not want it to be made as the primary purpose of the duty is to ensure that
the police and social services are made aware of abuse so that they can decide
what action to take to protect children.
119. It is unlikely that a confession made by a perpetrator to a relevant individual
would enjoy a reasonable expectation of privacy applying the principals in
Sutherland v HM Advocate23
. Even were it to do so, it is assessed that any
interference with such right to private life would be justified in order to prevent child
sexual abuse.
Article 9 – Right to freedom of thought, conscience and religion
120. There may be circumstances where a religious or spiritual advisor hears a
confession of abuse from a perpetrator. Imposing the duty may limit the
perpetrator’s freedom of religion (Article 9) as they may be deterred from seeking
religious or spiritual guidance. The advisor’s freedom of religion may also be limited
as they could be conflicted between their legal obligations and their religious or
spiritual convictions after hearing a confession.
121. The Government is satisfied that any such interference is justified and that
confessions made in the course of seeking religious or spiritual guidance do not
enjoy absolute protection under the ECHR. The social need to combat child sexual
abuse is strong, and it is proportionate to apply the duty to confessions made in a
religious or spiritual context.
Guidance about the disclosure of information by police for the purpose of
preventing sex offending
122. Clause 55 gives the Secretary of State the power to issue statutory guidance
to the police when they consider disclosing information about a person (a ‘relevant
individual’) to others to prevent sexual harm.
22 The Independent Inquiry into Child Sexual Abuse (IICSA) was established by the then Home
Secretary in 2015 to look at the extent to which state and non-state institutions in England and Wales
have discharged their duty to protect children from sexual abuse. The Inquiry published its final Report
in October 2022, which made a number of recommendations based on research, investigations and the
voices of victims and survivors of child sexual abuse. The duty for certain individuals to report child
sexual abuse is recommendation 13 of the Report. https://www.iicsa.org.uk/reportsrecommendations/publications/inquiry/final-report.html
23 [2020] UKSC 32
29
Article 8 – Right to private and family life, home and correspondence
123. This measure may result in interference with the relevant individual’s right to
private life as the police may release information about them to members of the
public, such as information about their previous convictions.
124. The Government is satisfied that the interference, if arising, with Article 8 is
justified and proportionate. The Government’s intention is that this measure will
place the current non-statutory guidance of the Child Sex Offender Disclosure
Scheme (CSODS)24 on a statutory footing and will also include guidance on the
assessment and disclosure of information where there is risk of sexual harm to
vulnerable adults (with such amendments and updates as are required over time).
125. In R (on the application of A) v SSHD25 the Supreme Court held that the CSODS
guidance was lawful and in accordance with police obligations under Article 8 as
the guidance advised the police to consider whether to seek representations from
the relevant individual before making a disclosure. The new statutory guidance will
include the same provision and guide the police on the disclosure of information to
protect both children and adults from sexual harm; it will not mandate disclosure in
all cases, and the police must still consider whether such disclosure is necessary
and proportionate in each case.
Offences relating to intimate photographs or films and voyeurism
126. Clause 56 and Schedule 8 will repeal two existing voyeurism offences at
sections 67(3) and 67A(2) Sexual Offences Act 2003 (‘SOA’) and introduce five
new offences concerning taking or recording intimate photographs or films which
show another person without their consent (offences A, B and C), or installing,
adapting, preparing or maintaining equipment with the intention to take intimate
photographs without the other person’s consent (offences D and E). Offences A to
C will sit in a new section 66AA of the SOA, and offences D and E will be in a new
section 66AC, as inserted by the Bill.
127. Offences A, B and C all include the element of the offence that the offender
must intentionally take a photograph or record a film which shows another person
(B) in an intimate state and that B does not consent. Offences A and C also require
that A does not reasonably believe that B consents. In addition, offence B requires
A to act with the intention of causing B alarm, distress or humiliation, whereas
offence C requires A to act for the purpose of A or another person obtaining sexual
gratification.
24 The Child Sex Offender Disclosure Scheme (CSODS) builds on existing law and procedures
and provides a clear access route for the public to raise child protection concerns. The
CSODS is focused on risk-management and the disclosure of information about a subject’s
convictions (including cautions, reprimands, and final warnings) of child sexual offences and
any other relevant information deemed necessary to protect a child or children from harm (e.g.
serious domestic violence, child cruelty/neglect).
https://www.gov.uk/government/publications/child-sex-offender-disclosure-schemeguidance/child-sex-offender-disclosure-scheme-police-guidance-accessible
25 2021 UKSC 37
30
128. Offence D requires an offender to install, adapt, prepare or maintain equipment
with the intention of enabling A or another person to commit offence A; offence E
requires an offender to install, adapt, prepare or maintain equipment with the
intention of enabling A or another person to commit offence B or C.
129. Offence A is subject to a defence of reasonable excuse as well as three other
exemptions, where (i) the photograph or film in question is (or A reasonably
believes that it is) taken or recorded in a place to which the public (or a section of
the public) have or are permitted to have access, B has no reasonable expectation
of privacy from the photograph or film being taken or recorded, and B is (or A
reasonably believes that B is), in the intimate state voluntarily; (ii) the photograph
or film in question shows a child in an intimate state, A is a member of the child’s
family, or a friend of the child, and the photograph or film is of a kind ordinarily
taken or recorded by friends and family; and (iii) the photograph or film in question
shows a child under 16 (B) in an intimate state and is taken by a healthcare
professional acting in that capacity, or otherwise in connection with the care or
treatment of B by a healthcare professional. In respect of the reasonable excuse
defence, the defendant bears the legal burden (on the balance of probabilities) of
proving that they had a reasonable excuse; whereas in respect of the other
exemptions, the defendant bears only an evidential burden.
130. The Bill also amends Schedule 2 to the SOA so that where a UK national, UK
resident, or a person who meets the residency or nationality requirements, does
something outside the UK which, if done in England and Wales, would have
constituted an offence under new section 66A(1) or (2), they can be tried in a court
in England and Wales.
131. The Bill will also amend Chapter 4 of Part 7 of the Sentencing Act 2020, to
ensure that the deprivation order power under section 153 of that Act will extend to
photographs and films that relate to Offence A, B or C. It will do so by inserting a
new section 154A that will provide that such a photograph or film is to be regarded
for the purposes of section 153 as used for the purposes of committing the relevant
offence.
132. Sections 75 and 76 of the SOA (evidential and conclusive presumptions) will
apply to offences A to C.
133. Additionally, following the creation of four new offences at sections 66B to 66D
of the SOA, as inserted by section 188 of the Online Safety Act 2023 (“OSA”),
which relate to the sharing or threatening to share photographs or films which
show, or appear to show, another person (B) in an intimate state, the Crime and
Policing Bill will amend the OSA in the following limited ways:
a) It amends and extends the exemption in section 66C(1) to capture cases in
which the defendant reasonably believed that the photograph or film they
31
shared had been taken in a place to which the public or a section of the
public had or were permitted to have access.
b) It amends section 66B to provide that section 76 of the Sexual Offences Act
2003 (conclusive presumptions about consent) apply to an offence under
section 66B(1), (2) or (3).
c) It makes the necessary amendments to confer extraterritorial application
and jurisdiction in respect of the two more serious sharing offences, and the
threat offence, at new section 66B(2), (3) and (4).
134. The proposed amendments engage Articles 5, 6, 7 and 8 and A1P1.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
135. Since these measures create criminal offences punishable with imprisonment,
Article 5 ECHR is engaged. The measure creates two summary only offences and
three either-way offences punishable that carry a maximum of two years’
imprisonment. Whilst it is for member states, not the Court, to decide what the
appropriate sentence for any given offence is, the maximum penalty must not be
arbitrary. The proposed penalties for the draft clauses are proportionate to the
nature and severity of the offending, any deprivation of liberty resulting from a
sentence of imprisonment will not be arbitrary. The penalties are also in line with
those for the comparable ‘sharing’ offences at new section 66B(1) to (3) SOA, as
inserted by the OSA, and existing offences in section 67 and section 67A of the
SOA. Further, the Court will be able to take account of all the relevant
circumstances of the offence and the offender in the usual way when handing down
a sentence. This provides an important safeguard.
Article 6 – Right to a fair trial
136. Article 6 ECHR is engaged by the measures in particular because:
a) There is a reverse burden attaching to the reasonable excuse defence for
offence A.
b) The defendant carries the evidential burden attaching to the no reasonable
expectation of privacy exemption for Offences A, B and C, and the family
and friends and healthcare exemptions for Offence A.
c) They will ensure that the evidential and conclusive presumptions about the
absence of consent in sections 75 and 76 SOA apply to Offences A to C,
and the conclusive presumptions in section 76 SOA apply to the offences at
section 66B(1), (2) and (3).
137. The reverse burden attaching to the proposed clause is compatible with Article
6(2) ECHR. As in R v Navabi26, the circumstances surrounding the taking of the
image and the reasons for doing so (i.e. the relevant information) are within the
knowledge and possession of the defendant. A defendant wishing to avail
themselves of the reasonable excuse defence should therefore be able to provide
the relevant information. If the defence imposed only an evidential burden on the
defendant, this would require the prosecution to then prove that there was no
26 [2005] EWCA Crim 2865
32
reasonable excuse, which is disproportionate. Finally, since the maximum penalty
for offence A is 6 months’ imprisonment, per Johnstone27, the arguments in favour
of a reverse burden need not be overwhelmingly compelling.
138. Each defendant will bear the evidential burden of raising sufficient evidence
concerning the existence of an exemption (where they apply) to satisfy the court
that the issue should be left to the court to decide: see section 101 of the
Magistrates’ Court Act 1980 (summary trials) and R v Hunt28 (trial on indictment).
If the defendant discharges that evidential burden, the legal burden of disproving it
will be on the prosecution (see, for example, Lobell29). This has been held to be
compatible with Article 6 (see, for example, DPP v Wright30).
139. Sections 75 and 76 SOA set out the evidential and conclusive presumptions
around the absence of consent or a reasonable belief in consent. Sections 75 and
76 will apply to Offences A, B and C, and section 76 will apply to the offences in
section 66B(1), (2) and (3). Whilst evidential and conclusive presumptions engage
Article 6 and the issue of presumption of innocence, the presumption of innocence
is not absolute: Falk v. the Netherlands31. An interference with the presumption of
innocence must be reasonably proportionate to the legitimate aim sought to be
achieved (Janosevic v Sweden32). The application of evidential and conclusive
presumptions to Offences A, B and C, and conclusive presumptions to section
66B(1), (2) and (3) is compatible with Article 6(2), for the following reasons:
a) The evidential presumption in respect of offences A, B, and C will only be
engaged in circumstances where it is plain to the defendant that the
complainant would not have been able to give valid consent, since it must
be proved both that one of an exhaustive list of circumstances existed and
the defendant knew those circumstances existed.
b) The Defendant will still be able to adduce rebuttal evidence to rebut the
evidential presumption: R v White33
.
c) The spirit of section 75 is already used in cases to which it does not
technically apply, insofar as directions following the wording of section 75
may accurately reflect the factual dispute between the complainant’s
evidence and that of the defendant when it comes to the issue of consent.
d) The conclusive presumption is limited to two very specific scenarios: both
require proof that the defendant intentionally deceived the complainant in
respect of key issues and therefore it will be obvious that the complainant
could not have provided consent to the relevant act. Requiring the
Prosecution to prove otherwise would be disproportionate.
27 [2003] UKHL 28
28 [1987] AC 352
29 [1957] 1 QB 547
30 [2009] EWHC 105
31 (66273/01)
32 (34619/97)
33 [2010] EWCA Crim 1929
33
e) In distinction to the way in which sections 75 and 76 apply to offences at
sections 1 – 4 SOA, it will not be the case that where a presumption is
established to apply conviction is inevitable for offences B and C: the
Prosecution will still have to prove that the defendant had the necessary
mens rea when they took, recorded or shared the photo or film before they
can be convicted. While this is not the case for offence A or an offence under
section 66B(1), the fact that a presumption, when successfully applied, will
lead to conviction in those cases mirrors the way sections. 75 and 76 apply
in respect of sections 1 – 4 SOA offences, which carry far higher sentences.
140. Both presumptions are therefore confined to reasonable limits and strike the
right balance between the rights of the complainant and the defendant. Applying
the presumptions is a proportionate means of achieving a legitimate aim.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
141. Article 7 provides that a punishment cannot be imposed other than where it is
prescribed by law. The elements of the offence, and the maximum penalty for the
offence, be clearly set out in a way in which a member of the public can understand.
The amendments will not have any retrospective effect. The amendments are
therefore compatible with Article 7.
Article 8 - Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
142. The clause engages Article 8, both in respect of the subject matter of the clause
and the imposition of notification requirements in respect of Offences C and E.
143. The subject matter of the clause engages Article 8 given its relation to the
privacy of Person B (the person who is shown in the photograph or film). Right to
one’s image and photographs is a well-recognised element of Article 8; nonconsensual taking or recording of an intimate image will go against these
protections. As such, we consider that Offences A to C enhance the protection of
Article 8 rights. To the extent that the exemptions could be considered to infringe
Article 8, our view is that they are justified within Article 8(2) in that they serve to
achieve a proportionate approach to what should, and should not, be criminalised.
These exemptions strike the right balance between carving out scenarios where
criminalisation of behaviour would not be appropriate or legitimate, and ensuring
that harmful behaviour is captured by the offences.
144. Offence C is added to Schedule 3 to the SOA, as is Offence E when committed
with the intent to enable commission of Offence C, meaning that where certain
criteria are met, offenders will be subject to notification requirements under Part 2
of the SOA. Any interference with an offender’s Article 8 ECHR rights is justified
within the meaning of Article 8(2). Paragraph 150 of the explanatory notes to the
SOA refers to the offences in Schedule 3 to the SOA as being “exclusively sexual
offences”; both offence C and E are sexual offences, and offence C requires the
defendant to act for the purposes of obtaining sexual gratification, and to the extent
34
offence E will be captured by Schedule 3 it requires the defendant to act with the
intent that they, or another person, will commit Offence C. There is therefore a clear
and rational connection between the offences themselves and the objectives of the
notification requirements so that the imposition of notification requirements in these
circumstances is a proportionate means of achieving a legitimate aim.
Article 1 Protocol 1 - Right to peaceful enjoyment of property
145. New section 154A will be inserted into the Sentencing Act 2020 (‘SA’) and will
provide that the photograph or film to which the offence A, B or C relates is to be
regarded for the purposes of section 153 of the SA as used for the purpose of
committing the offence. This will ensure that the court has the power under Chapter
4 of Part 7 of the SA to make an order depriving the offender of the photograph or
film in question upon conviction for offence A, B or C. This is necessary to avoid
causing additional harm to victims, arising from knowledge that the offender retains
the photographs and films that they unlawfully took or recorded, and is therefore in
the public interest.
146. The effect of the order will be that the property will be taken into the possession
of the police (section 156 of the SA). If a third party has a claim to the property,
they may, within 6 months of the date of the order, seek an order of a magistrates’
court for return of the property. It will therefore engage A1P1.
147. The measure will mean that the court has the power to make a deprivation order
under its existing powers in Chapter 4 of Part 7 of the SA. Deprivation orders under
the SA are not to be made as a matter of routine and can only be made when there
has been a sufficient investigation to justify a finding that the property is the product
of one of the offences and where the court is satisfied that the order is proportionate
and justified (R v Wright-Hadley (Stephen)34). Consequently, not only is the
measure itself justified, the courts will apply it in a way which ensures that the
power is exercised in a proportionate way.
148. Therefore, to the extent that the measure engages Article 1 of Protocol 1, the
interference is considered to be a proportionate means of achieving the legitimate
aim of the protection of the rights of others.
Exposure
149. Clause 57 amends the offence of exposure set out in section 66 of the SOA
2003 so that the offence is committed where a person (A) intentionally exposes
their genitals and either:
a) intends that someone will see them and be caused alarm, distress or
humiliation, or
b) where they act for the purpose of obtaining sexual gratification, intends that
someone will see them, and is reckless as to whether someone who sees
them will be caused alarm, distress or humiliation.
34 [2010] EWCA Crim 1929
35
150. The clause also inserts a new subsection (1A) to provide that where A acts for
the purpose of obtaining sexual gratification and intends only that a particular
person (or persons) will see their genitals, they do not commit an offence by virtue
of section 66(1)(b) unless they are reckless as to whether that particular person (or
one of those particular persons) will be caused alarm, distress or humiliation.
151. The existing offence at section 66 only captures exposure with intent to cause
alarm or distress. In contrast, the offence of sending etc photograph or film of
genitals at section 66A of the SOA 2003 (the so-called 'cyberflashing' offence),
which came into force on 31 January 2024, can be committed when the perpetrator
intends to cause alarm, distress or humiliation, or when they act for the purpose of
obtaining sexual gratification while reckless as to whether someone will be caused
alarm, distress or humiliation. The department is satisfied it is appropriate to
expand the mental element of section 66 so that it aligns with section 66A. This will
provide victims of in-person exposure greater protection under the SOA and ensure
that notification requirements are available where the relevant criteria are met.
152. The ECHR rights potentially engaged by this clause are those in Articles 5, 7
and 8.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
153. Whilst the maximum penalty remains the same, we are broadening the mental
element of the offence and therefore some cases of exposure that are not currently
captured by the criminal law will be following commencement of the amendments.
In our view however this has no significant impact on Convention rights. The
detention has a basis in domestic law; and it is not arbitrary. The existing penalties
are considered proportionate to the nature and the severity of the amended
offence, and the causal connection between the conviction and the deprivation of
liberty is maintained.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
154. The elements of the offence are clearly set out in the clause and we consider
the general public will have a good understanding of what it means for a person to
intentionally expose their genitals with intent to cause humiliation or for sexual
gratification while reckless as to whether someone who sees them will be caused
alarm, distress or humiliation. The terms ‘reckless’ and ‘humiliation’ are not defined
in the clause but are readily understood and are used elsewhere in the SOA and
the broader criminal law. Additionally, the amendment will align the mental element
of the section 66 exposure offence with the section 66A ‘cyberflashing’ offence,
generally making the law easier to understand.
155. We therefore consider that the test is satisfied as the maximum penalty for the
offence is clearly set out in the proposed clause, the offences will not have any
retrospective effect, and the public will have sufficient familiarity with the concepts
in the offence to identify the kinds of behaviour that would fall within it.
36
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
156. The existing section 66 offence is listed in Schedule 3 to the SOA 2003,
meaning that where the criteria are met, an offender will be made subject to
notification requirements in accordance with Part 2 - which require offenders to
notify the police of various personal details on annual basis as well as whenever
these details change, including: name, address, date of birth, passport and national
insurance number.
157. As some cases of exposure that are not currently captured by the criminal law
will be, once the amendments are commenced, notification requirements will be
imposed in some cases where currently they cannot be.
158. It is accepted that given their connection to a person’s personal data and private
life, notification requirements engage Article 8. However, we consider that this is
justified in accordance with Article 8(2).
159. The amended offence will require that the prosecution prove that A intends that
someone will see their genitals and be caused alarm, distress or humiliation (rather
than only alarm or distress, as is currently the case). Alternatively, the prosecution
will need to prove that A exposes their genitals for the purpose of obtaining sexual
gratification, with the intention that someone will see them and is reckless as to
whether someone who sees them will be caused alarm, distress or humiliation.
Furthermore, where the defendant intends only that a particular person or persons
will see their genitals, the prosecution must prove that they were reckless as to
whether that particular person (or one of those particular persons), as opposed to
persons generally, would be caused alarm, distress or humiliation.
160. As such, there is a clear and rational connection between the offence and the
objectives of the notification requirements. In our view therefore, the imposition of
notification requirements in these circumstances would be a proportionate means
of achieving a legitimate aim.
Sexual activity with a corpse
161. Clause 58 repeals the offence of sexual penetration of a corpse, and replaces
it with an overarching offence of sexual touching of a corpse, with a maximum
penalty of seven years’ imprisonment if the touching involved penetration, and five
years if it did not. The proposed amendment engages Articles 5, 7 and 8 of the
Convention.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
162. We consider that the proposed penalties are not arbitrary and that they are
proportionate to the nature and severity of the offending. Sexual offences against
dead bodies fall into a unique category of offending. They are capable of causing
significant harm to the families and friends of the dead person whose body has
37
been violated. It is right that, in setting the maximum penalty for these offences,
the particular dignity that is afforded to a dead person within our society is taken
into account, together with the fact that this offending behaviour inevitably detracts
from that dignity in a way which may be irrecoverable in the eyes of family and
friends. Additionally, the offence may well take place when family (or friends) are
still grieving for their lost family member, exacerbating the harm that will be felt by
them.
163. The potential penalty for penetrative sexual activity is higher to reflect the fact
that offending that involves penetration is generally considered more serious within
the framework of the SOA. The higher penalty therefore reflects the more serious
nature of the offending and the harm that can flow from it, thus maintaining the
causal connection between the conviction and the deprivation of liberty. Finally, the
court will retain the ability to take account of all the relevant circumstances when
arriving at an appropriate sentence. This provides an important safeguard.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
164. In order to comply with Article 7, the offence and corresponding penalty must
be clearly defined in law. The elements of the offence and the maximum penalties
are set out clearly in the proposed clause in a way in which a member of the public
could understand. The offence will not have any retrospective effect. The clause is
therefore compatible with Article 7.
Article 8 - Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
165. Article 8 protects an individual’s right to respect for their family and private life
against disproportionate interference from the state. Those offenders who commit
the new offence of sexual touching of a corpse will be subject to notification
requirements where the relevant criteria are met. Given their connection to a
person’s personal data and private life, notification requirements engage Article 8.
However, here, we consider that they are justified within the meaning of Article 8(2)
ECHR. Paragraph 150 of the explanatory notes to the SOA refers to the offences
in Schedule 3 to the SOA (those in relation to which a person becomes subject to
notification requirements upon conviction) as being “exclusively sexual offences”.
166. There is a clear and rational connection between the offence itself and the
objectives of the notification requirements so that the imposition of notification
requirements in these circumstances would be a proportionate means of achieving
a legitimate aim.
Management of Sex Offenders – notification requirements
167. Clause 59 requires a registered sex offender (a ‘RSO’) to notify the police of a
change of name not less than 7 days in advance of that change being made.
Clause 60 requires a RSO to notify the police in advance (not less than 12 hours
before leaving their address) of absences of more than 5 days from their notified
address. Clause 61 requires RSOs who pose a risk to children to give advance
38
notification (not less than 12 hours before entering a premise) if entering a premise
where children are present. Failing to comply with notification requirements without
reasonable excuse is a criminal offence.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
168. The new requirements will have retrospective effect and apply to existing RSOs
who are required to notify having been convicted of a relevant offence in the past.
The Government has considered whether the new requirements impose a penalty
on RSOs that is heavier than any penalty which existed at the time of their
conviction and has concluded that Article 7 is not contravened. The new
requirements are not punitive in nature or sufficiently severe to amount to a
‘penalty’ within the meaning of Article 7. Instead, the requirements are preventative
measures in accordance with the ECtHR’s judgment in Gardel v France.
35
169. In Gardel, the Court decided that the notification requirements which obliged
the RSO to provide proof of his address every 6 months and declare every change
of address for a period of 30 years, and which had been introduced after he had
been convicted of the qualifying sex offence, did not contravene Article 7 as the
main aim of the obligations were to prevent reoffending and facilitate police
investigations. As such, the obligations could not be considered punitive in nature
or constitute a sanction. Any failure to comply with the requirements would result
in another set of court proceedings.
170. The new requirements are to strengthen existing notification requirements to
enable the police to manage risk sex offenders effectively.
Article 8 - Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
171. The requirement to provide, in advance, additional detailed information
regarding their private life interferes with RSOs rights to private and family life
(Article 8). The Government is satisfied that the interference is justified and
proportionate as notification after the fact does not enable the police to risk manage
RSOs effectively, prevent reoffending or protect members of the public from the
risk of sexual harm.
172. In Adamson v United Kingdom36 the ECtHR held that the requirement on the
RSO to provide information to the police (name, address etc and any changes
within 14 days) amounted to an interference with his private life. Nevertheless, the
measures pursued legitimate aims to prevent crime and protect the rights of others.
For proportionality, it was necessary to weigh the importance of the aims pursued
by legislation against the notification requirements and consider the gravity of harm
which may be caused to victims of sexual offences. It is the duty of the state to
take certain measure to protect those individuals from such harm. The notification
35 Application no. 16428/05; 17 December 2009
36 App. No. 42293/98
39
requirements in this case were held not to be disproportionate to the aims pursued.
The Government is satisfied the same analysis applies here.
173. Certain conditions are to be satisfied for the more onerous obligations
(providing additional safeguards). The requirement to notify in advance before
entering premises where children are present, will only apply to those RSOs who
have convictions for child sexual offences or those whom the police have served a
notice upon for the purpose of protecting children from sexual harm. Therefore,
this requirement will only apply to those categories of offender seen as a particular
risk to children.
174. Those RSOs who are not convicted of child sex offences but have been served
a notice as pose a risk to children, may appeal the police decision. The police will
also be required to review notices every 12 months whereby the RSO will have the
opportunity to make representations and the police are able to cancel the notice if
satisfied that it is no longer necessary.
Management of Sex Offenders – restriction on applying for new identity
documents
175. Clause 66 confers a power on the police to issue a notice to a RSO to require
that offender to seek authorisation from the police before applying for replacement
identity documents (listed in section 7 of the Identity Documents Act 2010) in a new
name. A RSO who, without reasonable excuse, applies for replacement identity
documents in a new name without seeking authorisation commits a criminal
offence.
Article 7– No punishment without law
176. The new measure will have retrospective effect and apply to existing RSOs who
are required to notify having been convicted of a relevant offence in the past and
have been served a notice by the police. The Government has concluded that
Article 7 is not contravened. The new requirement is not punitive in nature or
sufficiently severe to amount to a ‘penalty’ within the meaning of Article 7. Instead,
the requirement is a preventative measure in accordance with Gardel v France37
(as detailed above).
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
177. This measure interferes with the private life (Article 8) of a RSO as it may restrict
them from changing their name if they are not authorised to apply for replacement
identity documents in that new name.
178. The Government is satisfied that the interference with this right is justified to
prevent crime and to protect the public from sexual harm from those RSOs who
have successfully changed their name on identification documents to evade
37 Application no. 16428/05; 17 December 2009
40
detection by the police, to obtain a clean criminal record certificate, to create a new
identity to gain access to vulnerable people or to use the new identity to circumvent
border controls.
179. The measure is proportionate as the police will only issue a notice to a RSO if
satisfied that it is necessary to do so for the purpose of protecting the public where
the RSO is considered likely to commit a further sexual offence and the change of
name may facilitate that.
180. There are specified conditions where the police may grant authorisation to a
RSO to apply for replacement identity documents in a new name, such as
marriage, civil partnership, divorce, religious reasons or exceptional
circumstances. Regulations made by the Secretary of State will also specify other
conditions. If a RSO provides evidence satisfying one of the conditions, the police
will provide authorisation to the RSO, unless there is need to protect the public
from the risk of sexual harm.
181. There is a right for a RSO to appeal against the issue of a notice or against any
refusal for a RSO to apply for replacement identity documents in their new name.
The police are also required to review notices every 12 months to determine
whether they should be cancelled.
PART 6: STALKING
Stalking Protection Orders (SPOs)
182. Clauses 69 and 70 give the criminal courts in England and Wales the power to
grant a SPO at the conclusion of criminal proceedings, either on conviction or
acquittal of the defendant. The SPO can include prohibitions and/or positive
requirements. Breaching a SPO without reasonable excuse is a criminal offence.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
183. The Government is satisfied that imposing prohibitions and/or requirements on
a person is not an unlawful interference with their right to liberty (Article 5) in
accordance with Guzzardi v Italy.38 In Guzzardi the Court held that Article 5 is not
concerned with mere restrictions on liberty of movement and that to determine
whether someone has been 'deprived of his liberty' within the meaning of Article 5,
is a matter of degree not substance. Account must be taken of a wide range of
factors including the type, duration, effect and manner of implementation.
Restrictions imposed on a person’s liberty by a SPO, such as a requirement to
attend an appropriate perpetrator intervention programme, are likely to amount to
‘mere restrictions.’ These provisions allow the courts to act in a way which is
compatible with Article 5 as they may only impose prohibitions and/or requirements
which are proportionate if satisfied that the person has carried out acts associated
38 [1980] ECHR 5
41
with stalking and the conditions are necessary to protect another person or persons
from such acts.
184. Article 5 is, however, engaged as breach of a SPO is a criminal offence which
can result in the arrest or detention of an individual. The applicable power of arrest
lies in section 24 of the Police and Criminal Evidence Act 1984. The penalty for the
offences is set out in the legislation. Consequently, the penalty and power of arrest
are in accordance with a procedure prescribed by law and fall within the
permissible grounds in Article 5(1), namely: the lawful detention of a person after
conviction (Article 5(1)(a)); the lawful arrest or detention of a person for noncompliance with the lawful order of a court (Article 5(1)(b); and the lawful arrest or
detention of a person effected for the purpose of bringing him or her before the
competent legal authority on reasonable suspicion of having committed an offence
(Article 5(1)(c). The protections provided for by Article 5(3) in respect of arrest are
met and offender subject to the order is able to appeal against conviction and
sentence.
Article 6 – Right to a fair trial
185. The court can impose a SPO without having to be sure to a criminal standard
of proof of the acts alleged and a SPO can be imposed on a person who has been
acquitted of criminal offences.
186. Established case-law sets out three criteria (Engel v Netherlands39) to consider
when determining whether there was a “criminal charge” and therefore, the
application of the criminal standard of proof. This depends on the domestic
classification of the proceedings, the nature of the offence, and the nature and
severity of the penalty.
187. In Chief Constable of Lancashire v Wilson and others40 the court applied the
criteria when considering a civil order which allowed the imposition of positive
requirements without the pre-requisite of a conviction. The court held that the
proceedings were not criminal in nature and therefore did not attract a criminal
burden of proof. The purpose of the civil order was not punitive but was
preventative for protection. Additionally, Jones v Birmingham City Council and
another41 held that the civil standard of proof on the balance of probabilities applied
to proceedings regarding civil orders and that the application of that standard was
compatible with Article 6.
188. The Government is satisfied that SPOs do not involve a determination of a
criminal charge and do not interfere with the right to a fair trial (Article 6). A SPO
is a civil order, and its purpose is to prevent and protect, i.e., to prevent a person
from carrying out acts associated with stalking and to protect a person or persons
from such acts. It is not punitive in nature.
39 1979-80 (1 EHRR 647)
40 [2015] EWHC 2763 (QB)
41 [2023] UKSC 27
42
189. The Government is satisfied that these civil proceedings clearly satisfy any fair
trial requirements arising under the civil limb of Article 6(1). The rules which govern
the imposition of a SPO made by the court ensure participation of the person
concerned in the court process, and the existence of a prescribed right of appeal
and ability to subsequently apply to the court to vary or discharge the order affords
further safeguards. The Government is satisfied that adequate safeguards are
provided to ensure procedural safeguards.
Articles 8 and 9 – Right to private and family life, home and correspondence
and freedom of thought, conscience and religion
190. The prohibitions and/or requirements are likely to interfere with the private and
family life of a person (Article 8) and may limit a person’s freedom of religion (Article
9). The Government is satisfied that the interference with Article 8 is justified as a
SPO is specifically designed to prevent a person from carrying out acts associated
with stalking and to protect people from harm of such acts. The imposed conditions
cannot go beyond what is necessary to protect another person. There are express
statutory safeguards to ensure that any requirements and/or prohibitions are
compatible with Article 9: the conditions of a SPO must, so far as practicable, avoid
conflict with the relevant individual's religious beliefs, and not interfere with their
work or education.
Articles 10, 11 and Article 1, Protocol 1- Rights to freedom of thought,
conscience and religion, expression and assembly and peaceful enjoyment
of possessions
191. Imposed prohibitions and/or requirements could interfere with a person’s right
to expression (Article 10) and their freedom of association (Article 11) by restricting
the person’s communication or association with other persons. Conditions may
also deprive a person from their property (Article 1 of the Frist Protocol) such as
being excluded from their home where they have stalked a partner. The
Government is satisfied that the interference with these rights is justified to prevent
crime and to protect others from harm. The conditions imposed must be
proportionate and cannot go beyond what is necessary.
192. Relevant to all engaged Article’s as detailed above, there is a right of appeal
and provision to apply to vary or discharge a SPO which provide additional
safeguards against the imposition of disproportionate terms.
Guidance about disclosure of information by police forces: releasing the
identity of a stalker
193. Clause 72 gives the Secretary of State the power to issue statutory guidance
to the police when considering releasing identifying information of a person (a
‘suspected perpetrator’) to another (the ‘victim’) where the suspected perpetrator
has carried out acts associated with stalking against the victim.
Article 8 – Right to private and family life, home and correspondence
43
194. Releasing information about a suspected perpetrator where they have not been
charged with a criminal offence may interfere with their right to private life (Article
8). The Government is satisfied that any interference which arises is justified as
the statutory guidance is designed to assist the police in protecting victims who
may be unaware of the true identity of their suspected stalker because the
behaviour is taking place online using multiple fake aliases. Not knowing the
suspected perpetrator’s true identity could be placing the victim at increased risk
of harm and re-victimisation. The measure is to prevent crime and to protect the
public. The guidance will not compel the police to disclose information; in each
case, and in accordance with their duties as public authorities under section 6 of
the Human Rights Act 1998, the police will still be required to consider whether, on
the individual facts, disclosure would be a justified interference with the suspected
perpetrator’s ECHR rights.
PART 7: OTHER OFFENCES AGAINST PEOPLE
Administering etc harmful substances (including by spiking)
195. Clause 73 creates a new offence of administering a harmful substance
(including by spiking). It repeals sections 22, 23 and 25 of the Offences against the
Person Act 1861 (1861 Act) and replaces section 24 with a single administering a
harmful substance offence. The new offence is committed if, unlawfully, a person
administers a harmful substance to, or causes a harmful substance to be taken by,
another person and the person does so with intent to injure, aggrieve or annoy the
other person. The ECHR rights potentially engaged are those in Articles 5 and 7.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
196. Article 5 is engaged as the maximum penalty for the offence upon conviction is
imprisonment for a term not exceeding ten years. The measure falls within the
authorised circumstances prescribed by Article 5(1)(a) where deprivation of liberty
is lawful, namely detention after conviction of a competent court. The proposed
penalties are proportionate to the nature and severity of the offending. The new
offence will continue to criminalise broadly the same behaviour that is currently
criminalised under the offences at sections 23 and 24 of the 1861 Act. The
maximum sentence imposed is the same as the maximum sentence for the existing
offence at section 23 of the 1861 Act and the offence at section 61 of the Sexual
Offences Act 2003 (Administering a substance with intent). The courts will be able
to take account of all relevant circumstances in the usual way. For example, the
court can reflect the seriousness of any harm caused when sentencing. The
defendant will be able to appeal against conviction and the resulting sentence in
the usual way. As such, the relevant prescriptions set out in Article 5 are satisfied.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
197. Article 7 is engaged in so far as it requires the offence and corresponding
penalty to be clearly defined in law. In relation to foreseeability, the new offence is
explicit that it captures ‘spiking’ behaviour. The penalty for the offence is clearly set
out in the proposed clause, the offences will not have any retrospective effect and
44
the public will have sufficient familiarity with the concepts in the offence to identify
the kinds of acts that would fall within it. The clause is therefore compatible with
Article 7.
Encouraging or assisting serious self-harm
198. Clauses 74 and 75 create the offence of encouraging and assisting serious selfharm. This measure repeals the communications offence at section 184 of the
Online Safety Act 2023 insofar as it extends to England and Wales and Northern
Ireland and replaces it with a broader offence covering all means of encouraging
or assisting serious self-harm. The offence is committed where a person does an
act capable of encouraging or assisting the serious self-harm of another person
and intends for the act to encourage or assist the serious self-harm of another
person. The ECHR rights potentially engaged are those in Articles 5, 7 and 10.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
199. Article 5 is engaged as the maximum penalty for the offence upon conviction is
imprisonment for a term not exceeding five years. The measure falls within the
authorised circumstances prescribed by Article 5(1)(a) where deprivation of liberty
is lawful, namely detention after conviction of a competent court. The proposed
penalties will be set out in primary legislation and are proportionate to the nature
and severity of the offending. The sentences imposed are in line with those
imposed by comparable offences. For example, the maximum penalty for unlawful
wounding/inflicting GBH without intent (section 20 of the 1861 Act) is five years’
imprisonment. The courts will be able to take account of the relevant circumstances
in the usual way. As such, the relevant prescriptions set out in Article 5 are satisfied.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
200. Article 7 is engaged in so far as it requires the offence and corresponding
penalty to be clearly defined in law. In relation to foreseeability, the terms
encouraging or assisting are widely understood given their use elsewhere - for
example, the inchoate offences in sections 44 to 46 of the Serious Crime Act 2007,
and the offence of encouraging and assisting suicide under section 2 of the Suicide
Act 1961. The clauses make clear that “encouraging” includes putting pressure on
a person to self-harm (whether by threatening them or otherwise). Both the terms
‘self-harm’ and ‘GBH’ are also widely understood. The penalty for the offence is
clearly set out in the clauses, the offences will not have any retrospective effect,
and the public will have sufficient familiarity with the concepts in the offence to
identify the kinds of acts that would fall within it. The clauses are therefore
compatible with Article 7.
Article 10 – Right to freedom of expression
201. Article 10 is directly engaged insofar as the offence is capable of being
committed by means of communication and will therefore make certain types of
communication unlawful. However, the offence is formulated in such a way as to
enable the general public to foresee the consequences of their conduct with a
reasonable degree of certainty and it is being introduced in line with a legitimate
45
aim - to protect the health and rights of those who may be encouraged or assisted
to seriously self-harm.
202. The interference is necessary in a democratic society. In Ponson v. France,
Application No. 26935/05, the Court held that in assessing the proportionality of
measures intended to protect health and morality, content capable of inciting young
people to act in unhealthy ways (in that case consuming tobacco) was a relevant
and sufficient reason to justify the interference with the publisher’s Article 10 right.
This offence is targeted at those who encourage or assist another person to
seriously self-harm (equivalent to grievous bodily harm) and they also have to
intend to encourage or assist another person to seriously self-harm. The offence
was set at this level, as recommended by the Law Commission, to avoid
criminalising those who share information about self-harming for therapeutic or
mental health purposes. The offence goes no further than is necessary to protect
the rights and health of others and constitutes a lawful interference with Article 10.
Child abduction
203. Clause 76 creates a new child abduction offence by amending section 1 of the
Child Abduction Act 1984 (1984 Act). At any time after a child is taken or sent out
of the UK with the appropriate consent, the offence is committed where a parent or
person with similar responsibility detains that child outside the UK without the
appropriate consent. The ECHR rights potentially engaged are those in Articles 5,
7 and 8.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
204. Article 5 is engaged as the maximum penalty for the offence upon conviction is
imprisonment for a term not exceeding 7 years. The measure falls within the
authorised circumstances prescribed by Article 5(1)(a) where deprivation of liberty
is lawful, namely detention after conviction of a competent court. The maximum
sentences imposed by this new offence are the same as the existing child
abduction offences at sections 1 and 2 of the 1984 Act. The penalties for the
offence will be set out in primary legislation and are proportionate to the nature and
severity of the offending. The courts will be able to take account of the relevant
circumstances in the usual way. As such, the relevant requirements set out in
Article 5 are satisfied.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
205. Article 7 is engaged in so far as it requires the offence and corresponding
penalty to be clearly defined in law. In relation to foreseeability, the offence is clear
what kind of acts fall within in. The new offence is inserted into section 1 of the
1984 Act and therefore the same concepts that apply to the existing section 1
offence also apply to the new offence. For example, section 1 sets out who
‘persons connected with a child’ are, what ‘appropriate consent’ is and the
defences available. The word ‘detention’ has its ordinary meaning, and the concept
is further explained at section 4 of the 1984 Act. The penalty for the offence is
clearly set out in the clause, the offences will not have any retrospective effect, and
46
the public will have sufficient familiarity with the concepts in the offence to identify
the kinds of acts that would fall within it. The clause is therefore compatible with
Article 7.
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
206. The offence engages Article 8 as it impacts the family life of the parent or person
with similar responsibility detaining the child (the ‘detaining parent’), the other
parent or person with similar responsibility (the ‘left-behind’ parent) and the child.
207. The conduct of the ‘detaining parent’ interferes with the left-behind parent’s right
to maintain their relationship with their child, including, depending on the
circumstances, living with their child or having regular contact with them. The
measure is therefore expected to positively impact the Article 8 right of the leftbehind parent. The detention also interferes with the child’s Article 8 rights as the
detention might cause the child actual harm, or at the minimum it is likely to have
the effect of separating the child from the left-behind parent and result in the child
not living at their usual address or attending their usual school.
208. The criminalisation of the detaining parent’s conduct will impact their own ability
to maintain their relationship with their child and/or wider family. However, there
are important protections built into the offence for the detaining parent. They will
have a defence if they: believed the left-behind parent consented to the detention
or would have consented if they were aware of the relevant circumstances; have
taken all reasonable steps to communicate with the left-behind parent to get
consent to the detention but were unable to so; or the left-behind parent
unreasonably refused to consent. Additionally, DPP consent is required to
prosecute and therefore only cases where there is a public interest in prosecuting
will be advanced.
209. Considering all the circumstances, a fair balance is struck between the
competing interests of the child, the left-behind parent and the detaining parent.
The interference with the detaining parent’s Article 8 right is justified as it is a
proportionate means of achieving the legitimate aim of protecting the rights and
freedoms of the child and the left-behind parent. The offence is ‘proportionate’ in
that given the protections in place, it is no more than necessary to address the
problem.
PART 8: PREVENTION OF THEFT AND FRAUD
Electronic devices for use in vehicle theft
210. Clauses 78 and 79 introduce a new offence to criminalise the importing,
making, modifying, supplying, offering to supply and possession of electronic
devices for use in vehicle theft. These measures will strengthen how law
enforcement agencies confront rapidly evolving tools and technologies which,
47
whilst currently legal, have few legitimate purposes and are being exploited by
criminals in order to steal vehicles.
Article 1, Protocol 1 – Right to peaceful enjoyment of property
211. They may have the effect of depriving an individual of ownership of their
property (Article 1 Protocol 1), if the articles are seized by the police as evidence
and permanently confiscated if the offence is made out. The Government is
satisfied the measure is clearly prescribed by law (the provisions are set out in
primary legislation) and justified as a proportionate means of tackling individuals
who produce such articles but are currently able to keep sufficient distance from
crimes to avoid prosecution. Articles may only be seized where the police have
reasonable suspicion that the device will be used in connection with a relevant
offence, and it is a defence for the person charged to show that they did not intend
or suspect that the device would be used in connection with a relevant offence. It
will assist law enforcement to remove from circulation articles which facilitate
vehicle crime and, as such, is necessary in pursuit of the legitimate aim of
“preventing crime”.
Article 6 – Right to a fair trial
212. It is irrelevant for the purposes of the offence at clause 78 whether the person
intends to use the item in connection with a relevant offence; rather, the individual’s
state of mind is a defence. Article 6 does not prohibit rules which transfer the
burden of proof to the accused to establish a defence, provided that the overall
burden of proof remains with the prosecution. It is now well settled that in deciding
the issue the court should focus on the particular circumstances of the case and
the balance between the public interest and the protection of the rights of the
individual; Lord Bingham in Sheldrake v DPP42 set out relevant factors. Such
presumptions must be within “reasonable limits” and “justified”43
.
213. The Government is satisfied the imposition of a reverse burden of proof is
necessary to tackle possession, manufacture and distribution of articles that are
used in vehicle crime and have a harmful impact on society. The subject matter of
the defence will be within the knowledge and ability of the accused to demonstrate
and therefore it is not unfair to require them to discharge this burden.
Possession and supply of a SIM farm and other specified articles which may be
used in connection with fraud perpetrated by means of an electronic
communications network or service.
214. Clauses 80 and 81 deal with the possession and supply of SIM farms and
clauses 83 and 84 deal with fraud facilitated by other (specified) articles that use
an electronic communications network or service. A ‘SIM farm’ is a device which is
capable of using five or more SIM cards to make phone calls and send or receive
text messages. Clause 85 gives the Secretary of State the power to specify articles
42 [2004] UKHL 43, [2005] 1 AC 264 at [21].
43 See Salonika v France 13 E.H.R.R. 379, R v Foye [2013] All ER (D) 248
48
for the purposes of clauses 83 and 84. These measures will strengthen law
enforcement agencies’ ability to confront rapidly evolving technologies which,
whilst currently legal, have few legitimate purposes and are being exploited by
criminals in order to commit fraud on a large scale.
Article 6 – Right to a fair trial
215. These provisions engage Article 6(2) of the ECHR relating to criminal
proceedings, in particular regarding the “reverse burden” on the defendant to prove
the available defences, including of “good reason or lawful authority”. Article 6 does
not prohibit rules which transfer the burden of proof to the accused to establish a
defence, provided that the overall burden of proof remains with the prosecution.
The subject matter of the defences will be within the knowledge and ability of the
accused to demonstrate, and it is accordingly not unfair to require the accused to
discharge this burden of proof. These provisions are within such reasonable limits
as are permitted, are justified and are compatible with the Convention44
.
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
216. Schedule 10 contains search powers for law enforcement officers. It provides
them with the power to search for SIM farms and specified articles, in certain limited
circumstances and subject to all the safeguards that apply under similar statutory
and (in Scotland) common law regimes. These powers may engage Article 8 of the
ECHR. The new powers to search for SIM farms and other specified articles are
necessary for the new measures to be used effectively and are not already
contained within existing legislation. There are a number of safeguards included in
the new search powers modelled on those in sections 36 to 49 of the Psychoactive
Substances Act 2016. These include that a search warrant would be required to be
issued by a justice of the peace, sheriff or lay magistrate to enter and search
premises. This will ensure that there is independent scrutiny of the necessity and
proportionality of exercising the powers; especially where, for example, the
premises are a person’s home.
Article 1, Protocol 1 – Right to peaceful enjoyment of property
217. A1P1 is engaged by the criminal offences themselves given that some of those
who are currently in possession of SIM farms, or specified articles that may be
added by regulations, will effectively no longer be able to possess them for reasons
other than in accordance with the defences. The Government is satisfied the
approach amounts to a “control” rather than a “deprivation”
45
. The offences are
intended to combat crime and protect members of the public from loss of their own
property through fraud. The proposal is a control on the use of property “in
accordance with the general interest”46. The measures will be subject to conditions
provided for by law, as set out in the legislation.
44 See Salabiaku v. France 13 E.H.R.R. 379; and R v Foye [2013] All ER (D) 248.
45 See R (on the application of Mott) v Environment Agency [2018] UKSC 10, NA v Turkey (2005) 45
EHRR 287; and Papamichalopoulos v Greece (1993) 16 EHRR 440)
46 Hutten-Czapska v Poland (2007) 45 EHRR 4.
49
PART 9: PUBLIC ORDER
Offences of concealing identity at a protest; possession of pyrotechnic articles
at protests; war memorials
218. Part 9 creates three new criminal offences in relation to public order: wearing
or otherwise using an item which conceals identity in a public place within a
designated area; possession of pyrotechnics at protests; and climbing on a
specified war memorial.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
219. Article 5 is engaged as the creation of new criminal offences punishable by
imprisonment (the offence of concealing identity in a designated area and the
offence of climbing on a war memorial) may result in a deprivation of liberty.
However, the measures fall within the permissible grounds in Article 5(1)(a) and (c)
of the ECHR; namely, the lawful detention of persons after conviction by a
competent court and the lawful arrest or detention of a person effected for the
purpose of bringing them before the competent legal authority on reasonable
suspicion of having committed an offence. The procedural safeguards required by
Article 5 will be assured through the ordinary procedures of the criminal justice
system. The proposed penalties in the clauses are proportionate to the nature and
severity of the offending (one month and three months, respectively). As such, the
Government is satisfied the measures are compatible with Article 5.
Article 6 – Right to a fair trial
220. The Government is satisfied that the measures comply with the criminal limb of
Article 6, and in particular that the defences creating a reverse legal burden (the
offences of concealing identity in a designated area and climbing on a specified
war memorial) and reverse evidential burden (offence of possession of
pyrotechnics) are justified and do not violate the presumption of innocence as
contained within Article 6(2). Article 6 does not prohibit rules which transfer the
burden of proof to the accused to establish a defence, provided that the overall
burden of proof remains with the prosecution. The subject matter of the relevant
defences will be within the knowledge and ability of the accused to demonstrate,
and it is accordingly not unfair to require the accused to discharge this burden of
proof. If the prosecution should be required to prove the lack of a defence in these
circumstances, the Government is satisfied that this would place an unnecessary
burden on the prosecution that would significantly limit the ability to prosecute the
offence. These provisions are therefore within such reasonable limits as are
permitted and are compatible with the Convention.
Offence of concealing identity at protests
221. Clauses 86 to 88 create a new offence of wearing or otherwise using an item
that conceals identity (either the identity of the person wearing or using the item,
or the identity of another) in a public place within an area designated by police.
50
There is a defence where a person is wearing or using the item for a purpose
relating to health, religious observance or in connection with their work.
222. As this measure relates to the policing of assemblies and processions, it has
the potential to interfere with individuals’ ECHR rights under Article 10 (freedom of
expression) and 11 (freedom of assembly) as well as Article 9 (freedom of thought,
conscience and religion) given that some items of clothing associated with religious
observance can conceal identity. It also engages Article 14 (prohibition of
discrimination) in relation to those rights.
Articles 9, 10 and 11: Freedom of thought, conscience and religion,
expression and assembly and association
223. Articles 9, 10 and 11 are qualified rights and the Government is satisfied the
measure is a necessary and proportionate means of achieving the legitimate aim
of protecting public safety, the prevention of disorder and crime and the protection
of public order.
224. The offence is considered to be sufficiently clear and foreseeable to be
‘prescribed by law’ as required by Articles 10(2) and 11(2) and by Article 9(2). A
pressing social need for these measures is demonstrated by the disorderly conduct
witnessed at certain protests. ECtHR case law has established that states have a
margin of appreciation in assessing whether such a need exists (Sunday Times v
UK (No. 1)47. There is evidence from the police that some protestors are using face
coverings to conceal their identity as a means of evading conviction for criminal
offences committed during protests, and that the existing police powers to require
the removal of such face coverings are not effective in preventing this.
225. The very limited context in which wearing a face covering will be a criminal
offence at a protest means the measure is proportionate. It will only be an offence
where a designation has been made, which requires a police officer of the rank of
inspector or above to have the reasonable belief that a protest may take place in a
particular locality that is likely to involve the commission of offences, and it is
expedient, in order to prevent or limit the commission of offences, to make a
designation. Such a designation can only last for 24 hours (unless extended by 24
hours on the basis that offences have in fact been committed or suspected to have
been committed).
226. The fact that under section 6 of the Human Rights Act 1998 (HRA 1998) the
police, the CPS and the courts have a duty to act compatibly with Convention rights
when exercising their powers and duties also provides a safeguard against
disproportionate interference.
Article 14 - Protection from discrimination
227. Article 14 may potentially be engaged in conjunction with Articles 9, 10 and 11,
given it is possible that the police may take action against more people of certain
47 6538/74
51
religions, more women than men, more people with disabilities (who may be more
likely to wear face coverings for health reasons than those who do not have a
disability) and/or more people in urban areas than rural areas (where there is a
greater prevalence of protests likely to involve the commission of offences) which
may impact minority ethnic communities. However, the Government’s view is that
any such impact, if it materialised, would be objectively justified; arrest and charge
will be dependent on the offence being made out – and as such action will only be
taken against persons who are wearing the item without a legitimate purpose and
who are therefore considered to be wearing the items for nefarious reasons. Those
wearing face coverings for health, religious or work reasons are not within scope
of the offence.
228. The fact that under section 6 of the Human Rights Act 1998 (HRA 1998) the
police, the CPS and the courts have a duty to act compatibly with Convention rights
when exercising their powers and duties provides a safeguard against
disproportionate interference.
Offence of possession of pyrotechnic articles at a protest
229. Clause 89 prohibits the possession of pyrotechnic articles, including fireworks
and flares, when taking part in a public assembly or public procession that
constitutes a protest, or a one-person protest. There is a reasonable excuse
defence, which explicitly includes where a person has a relevant article in their
possession in connection with their work. In addition, there is a specific exemption
for cultural and religious events of a kind at which pyrotechnic articles are
customarily used.
230. As this measure relates to the policing of assemblies and processions, it has
the potential to interfere with individuals’ ECHR rights under Article 10 (freedom of
expression) and 11 (freedom of assembly) as well as Article 9 (freedom of thought,
conscience and religion) given the use of pyrotechnics such as fireworks at certain
religious and cultural events. It also engages Article 14 (prohibition of
discrimination) in relation to those rights.
Articles 10 and 11 - Freedoms of expression, assembly and association
231. The offence is sufficiently clear and foreseeable to be ‘prescribed by law’ as
required by Articles 10(2) and 11(2).
232. A pressing social need for these measures is demonstrated by the need to deter
disorderly and potentially dangerous conduct in public spaces involving
pyrotechnics. For example, there have been instances where fireworks have been
fired at police officers while policing crowds at protests.
233. The measures pursue the legitimate aims of preventing crime and disorder and
of public safety. Any interference with Articles 10 and/ or 11 is proportionate. The
offence prohibits very specific conduct by those attending processions and
52
assemblies. It does not prevent protest participation or otherwise impose a blanket
prohibition on exercise of freedom of expression or assembly rights.
Article 9 - Freedom of thought, conscience and religion, together with Article
14 - Protection from discrimination
234. Article 9 is potentially engaged, alongside Article 14, because fireworks or other
pyrotechnic articles are traditionally used at some events with a religious focus.
However, only those participating in protest events will fall within scope of the
offence, and there is a specific exemption for those taking part in a cultural or
religious event of a kind at which pyrotechnic articles are customarily used.
235. In addition, the duties on the police, CPS and the courts under section 6 of the
Human Rights Act 1998 to act compatibly with Convention rights provides a
safeguard against disproportionate interference.
Offence of climbing on a specified war memorial
236. Clause 90 (together with Schedule 11) creates a new offence of climbing on a
specified war memorial. To the extent that the offence relates to the policing of
assemblies and processions, it has the potential to interfere with individuals’ ECHR
rights under Article 10 (freedom of expression) and 11 (freedom of assembly).
Articles 10 and 11 - Freedoms of expression, assembly and association
237. The offence is sufficiently clear and foreseeable to be ‘prescribed by law’ as
required by Articles 10(2) and 11(2). A pressing social need for this measure has
been demonstrated by recent activity involving protestors climbing on war
memorials, causing significant public concern about the regular and persistent
presence of large numbers of protestors in close proximity to culturally and
historically significant monuments. There is concern about the potential for
damage as well as the fact that the activity implies a lack of respect for the
importance of such monuments to the wider public.
238. The measure pursues the legitimate aims of preventing crime and disorder and
of public safety. Any interference with rights under Articles 10 and 11 is justified
and proportionate, taking into account that a person’s right to freedom of
expression (under Article 10) and freedom of assembly (under Article 11) will not
be significantly restricted by a prohibition on climbing on specified war memorials.
It will remain possible for a person to exercise their right to protest on or near war
memorial sites, provided they do not seek to climb them.
239. Furthermore, when considering proportionality in this context, the ECtHR has
been shown to place significant weight on the possibility of harm or insult being
caused to public monuments, such as in the case Handzhiyski v. Bulgaria48 and
the case of Sinkova v. Ukraine49. The war memorials specified in the offence are
48 (10783/14)
49 (39496/11)
53
all grade 1 listed buildings on the National Heritage List for England, which are
therefore already deemed to have legal protection given their historical importance
to the country.
PART 10: POWERS OF POLICE ETC
Suspension of Internet Protocol addresses and domain names
240. Clause 92 and Schedule 12 deal with the power for investigative agencies to
apply to the court for an order that a third-party entity involved in the provision of
domain names or IP addresses should suspend a domain name or IP address so
that information is no longer accessible.
241. The power is aimed at preventing access to servers and devices that are being
used to facilitate crime, for example a server that is being used as a commandand-control node to distribute malware. The content at the IP address or domain
would not necessarily be unlawful, it is that the infrastructure associated with the
domain or IP address are being used to facilitate criminal activity; the Online Safety
Act 2023, by contrast, is focused on regulation of content on platforms.
Article 8 - Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
242. If a domain name or IP address is suspended, the user of that domain name
(e.g. website) or device linked to the IP address will no longer be able to access
communications intended for it, therefore impacting on a person’s correspondence
and their ability to communicate through any device linked to that IP address or the
domain name.
243. The Government is satisfied that any interference with someone’s Article 8
rights by this measure would be justified as necessary and proportionate for the
purpose of the prevention and detection of crime. This method of suspending
domain names or IP addresses would disrupt criminal activity by preventing
malicious communications from reaching intended victims, infecting devices with
malicious software or controlling devices already infected.
244. To grant an application for a suspension order, the court must, among other
matters, consider the suspension is necessary and proportionate to prevent the IP
address or domain name being used in serious crime. Proportionality
considerations would include innocent users who might be affected by the
suspension or other services using the domain or IP address. The person on whom
the order is served or any other person affected by it can apply to the court for
variation or discharge of the order.
Article 10 - Freedom of expression
245. A suspension order could have the effect of preventing a person from
communicating information and ideas externally on the internet. Non-disclosure
requirements associated with suspension applications and orders will prevent the
54
entity involved in the provision of IP addresses or domain names from disclosing
the making of the application or order and the contents to any other person without
permission of a judge or the officer that made the application.
246. The Government is satisfied that any interference with Article 10 would be
justified as necessary and proportionate for the prevention of disorder or crime.
There must be reasonable grounds to believe that the IP address or domain name
is being used for the purposes of serious crime and that it is necessary and
proportionate to prevent access to prevent it being used for serious crime. Nondisclosure requirements could be applied for when considered necessary to
prevent the persons using the IP address or domain name for purposes of serious
crime becoming aware of the application or order before the suspension has taken
effect.
Article 1, Protocol 1 – Right to peaceful enjoyment of property
247. If a domain name or IP address is suspended, the user of that domain name
(e.g. website) or device linked to the IP address will no longer be able to access
communications intended for it. A person will have paid for the exclusive right to
use a domain name and a domain name is considered to be intangible personal
property. Suspension of the use of the domain will therefore interfere with this right.
Similarly, a person provided with an IP address will have paid for the provision of
internet access and the IP address will enable such activity. Suspension of the IP
address linked to a device will mean that such access is restricted.
248. There is a limited pool of IPv4 addresses and therefore any suspension will
have an impact on the number of addresses that an IP address provider has
available to allocate. The provider may have to purchase replacement IP
addresses to compensate for the suspension.
249. The Government is satisfied any interference with peaceful enjoyment of
property is necessary and justified for the public interest in protecting victims of
crime by disrupting connectivity with, and infection of, devices belonging to third
parties. Failure to suspend an IP address for an adequate amount of time could
impact future users of the IP address or if re-assigned to the same customer could
result in its re-use in crime. Interference on the IP address provider will be limited
to what is necessary to disrupt the criminal activity and the law enforcement or
investigative agency will need to justify the suspension period. The IP address will
remain with the provider which will be able to re-allocate it once the suspension
period ends.
Electronically tracked stolen goods: search without warrant
250. Clause 93 provides the police with the power to enter premises and to search
for stolen goods (as defined by sections 24 and 24(A)(8) of the Theft Act 1968)
electronically geolocated to the premises. The measure also confers a power to
seize stolen goods and evidence of theft offences, exercisable by police following
55
lawful entry. The power will be exercisable in relation to domestic / private and
business premises. Clause 94 makes analogous provision for the service police.
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
251. The powers conferred by clauses 93 and 94 will interfere with the right to
respect for the ‘home’ (which has been established by the ECtHR to include
business premises50) and in some circumstances private life and/ or
correspondence (e.g. where communications-related items are seized). In some
circumstances exercise of the power will interfere with the rights of third parties in
addition to those of criminal suspects.
252. The provision is clear and ensures that the circumstances and conditions
required for the power’s exercise are foreseeable. The power is intended to assist
in detecting and preventing (by deterrence) crime and protecting the rights of
victims of theft, by enabling police to act expediently within the ‘golden hour’ while
stolen property can still be located before being further disposed of. This is required
to assist both in bringing perpetrators to justice and restoring property to its rightful
owner.
253. Entry and search powers with no requirement for pre-exercise judicial scrutiny51
and those which may impact on the Article 8 rights of innocent third parties52 such
as purchasers in good faith of stolen goods, have been subjected to intense
scrutiny by the ECtHR. In view of this, to aid in ensuring proportionality and
exercise of the power in accordance with the law, the provision will contain a
number of statutory safeguards against arbitrariness or abuse including:
a) A requirement for reasonable belief on the part of the police, regarding both
the nature of the property (stolen) and its location. In addition, the authorising
officer must be satisfied that there is evidence of electronic geolocation data
showing that the relevant item is, or has since it was stolen been, on the
relevant premises. In any event, the police must have a reasonable belief that
the stolen goods are still on the premises.
b) A requirement limiting the exercise of the entry and search powers to
circumstances where the police reasonably believe that the time inherently
involved in obtaining a warrant would seriously prejudice the purpose of the
entry and search.
c) The exercise of the entry and search power is to be authorised at police
Inspector level at minimum.
d) The police constable exercising the power must be in uniform and identify
themselves and the reasons for exercising the power to the occupier.
50 E.g. Buck v Germany (41604/98).
51 E.g. Vinks & Ribicka v Latvia (282926/10)
52 E.g. Ratushna v Ukraine (17318/06)
56
e) The entry/search power must be exercised within 24 hours of authorisation,
and at a reasonable hour unless this would seriously prejudice the
entry/search’s purpose.
f) A carve out for legally privileged material and excluded and special procedure
material (the latter two categories include journalistic material and business
records held in confidence) as defined in the Police and Criminal Evidence Act
(PACE) 1984. These will be subject to the seizure and sift powers in Part 2 of
the Criminal Justice and Police Act 2001, which include provision for the return
of such material when discovered during sift.
g) Limited scope of the search (the extent reasonably required to locate the
specific stolen property reported to police).
h) Any force used by police in exercise of the power will be limited to what is
necessary and reasonable in the circumstances.
i) Police will be subject to a duty to produce a written record of the authorisation,
including the grounds, for entry and search; and of seized items and seizure
grounds. This must be done as soon as reasonably practicable following
authorisation and seizure.
j) The seizure power will be narrower than that in PACE 1984 section 19(2)-(4)
(which will be excluded in relation to police exercising this entry and search
power), focusing on stolen goods/ theft offences only. It will be subject to the
constable’s reasonable belief as to both the nature and location of the item/s
(stolen goods or theft offence evidence) and to the necessity of seizure to
prevent circumstances which would prejudice the search purpose, such as loss
or destruction.
k) There is existing provision for the rightful owner of property to apply to have
the property delivered or restored to them, which will apply to items seized as
a result of exercise of these powers.
254. The Government is satisfied that whilst the power is intrusive and no prior
judicial oversight is required, the array of legislative safeguards will be sufficient to
protect against abuse and arbitrariness and protect legally privileged and other
sensitive material from intrusion. The power will be exercised in preference to an
application for a judicial warrant only when reasonably deemed necessary in all the
circumstances. The police, as a public authority, must exercise their functions in an
ECHR compatible way (section 6 of the HRA 1998). An individual may, after the
event, challenge the exercise of the power by the police via the police complaints
process and/or by way of judicial review; this will provide a degree of judicial
oversight and scrutiny of the practical operationalisation of the power.
Article 10 - Freedom of expression
255. Article 10 rights may be engaged where journalistic material is seized,
particularly that subject to source confidentiality.53 This is likely to be only in very
53 E.g. Vinks & Ribicka v. Latvia (28926/10)
57
specific circumstances, such as if a journalist is subject to an allegation that they
have stolen an electronic device, causing the police to enter their premises and
seize the item. However, the search and seizure powers are not exercisable in
relation to items comprising or including excluded or special procedure material
(within the meaning in sections 11 and 14 of PACE 1984).
256. The provisions will be accessible, precise and foreseeable as to the scope of
the seizure power and the procedure to apply for delivery / recovery of the property.
257. The provisions contain the above mentioned carve out/ safeguard for excluded
and special procedure material. Excluded material includes material acquired or
created for journalistic purposes which is held in confidence, and special procedure
material incorporates other journalistic material. Where material is seized because
it is not reasonably practicable for police to determine on the premises whether an
item comprises or includes this type of material, or to separate material out, police
initial examination will be restricted to what is necessary to determine whether
material falls within these excluded categories, and any such material must be
separated and returned (as Part 2, Criminal Justice and Police Act 2001 applies).
258. The Government is satisfied that this will ensure that Article 10 rights are
interfered with in very limited circumstances and that any interference will be
minimal, justified and proportionate.
Article 1, Protocol 1 - Right to peaceful enjoyment of property
259. Where property is seized in exercise of the power, it is likely to constitute state
control of property and / or deprivation within the scope of A1P1 and thus interfere
with this right.
260. The provisions will be accessible, precise and foreseeable as to the scope of
the seizure power and the procedure to apply for delivery of the property.
261. The power is intended to protect the public interest inherent in protecting the
A1P1 rights of theft victims (to their own property) and detecting and preventing
crime. Proportionality will be ensured by provision of legislative safeguards,
including the reasonable belief threshold in relation to the nature of the property or
evidence and the necessity to seize it to prevent disappearance or damage, and in
particular the requirement that there is specific evidence as to location, and a
mechanism for the rightful owner of property to apply to have it released or restored
to them.
Article 14 – Protection from discrimination
262. There may be the potential for Article 14 to be engaged (parasitic on the rights
above) on the basis that ethnic minorities are disproportionately represented in the
criminal justice system and so may be disproportionately the subjects of this new
power. However, the inclusion of a requirement for reasonable belief as to the
nature and location of the items which are the focus of the power, and for the
58
relevant property to have been electronically tracked to the premises, means that
intelligence will be location-led, rather than suspect-led. In addition, the police will
need to comply with their duties under section 6 of the HRA, and under the Equality
Act 2010, when exercising this power. Guidance on the operation of the power is
intended to be given in the PACE Codes of Practice, which may assist in mitigating
against any disproportionate impacts on the basis of protected characteristics on
operationalisation.
Access to driver licence records
263. Clause 95 makes changes to the existing regime of police and law enforcement
access to the Driver and Vehicles Licensing Agency (‘DVLA’) driver register by
replacing section 71 of the Criminal Justice and Court Services Act 2000 (‘the 2000
Act’). This expands access for authorised persons in police and law enforcement
bodies to DVLA databases.
264. Article 8 is engaged as the protection of personal data is of fundamental
importance to a person’s enjoyment of the right to respect for private and family
life. The interference will only arise at the point of access to specific data sets
contained within the DVLA database (i.e. mere right of access doesn’t in itself
infringe individual’s rights, as no personal data is yet being processed). The
provision will only allow access to the data for policing and law enforcement
purposes and for the purposes of, or in connection with, the review function of
Independent Commission for Reconciliation. A number of safeguards will apply to
the access:
a) the Secretary of State must specify the circumstances in which information
may be made available in regulations;
b) the clause explicitly sets out that the provisions do not authorise a disclosure
unless it complies with data protection legislation;
c) the Secretary of State may:
i. set minimum standards, by regulations, for the handling and use
of DVLA information by authorised persons;
ii. issue a Code of Practice relating to the access and use of the
relevant information. All persons accessing data under the
provisions must have regard to any such code of practice;
iii. prohibit a body from using the data for a specific purpose, or at
all, in the event that there are concerns about that body’s
appropriate use of the data, such as following a poor inspection
and a subsequent failure to improve.
265. The Government therefore is satisfied the provision a proportionate means of
achieving the legitimate aim of preventing disorder or crime, and that there are
safeguards in place to ensure proportionate application.
59
Testing of persons in police detention for presence of specified controlled drugs
266. Clause 96 amends sections 63B and 63C of PACE 1984 to confer further
powers on the police to drug test on arrest persons aged 18 or over (or after charge,
for persons aged 14 or over) for specified Class B and C drugs in addition to
specified Class A drugs. Amendments are also made to the Drugs Act 2005 (“DA
2005”) by clause 97, to enable persons who test positive for any specified
controlled drug to be required to attend an assessment (under Part 3 of that Act)
as to their drug misuse.
267. Clause 98 amends PACE 1984 to enable the taking of up to two samples, where
existing statutory conditions are met, and where the first sample is insufficient or
unsuitable. The list of trigger offences for which a person who is arrested and/or
charged may be automatically tested (Schedule 13) is amended, to include violent
offences which have a link to drug misuse and remove existing offences where
there is no longer a link to drug misuse.
Article 6 – Right to a fair trial
268. Article 6 is engaged as a person who fails to provide a sample for testing without
good cause, or who fails to attend or stay for the duration of an initial or follow-up
assessment following a positive drug test result, commits a criminal offence. The
Government is satisfied these amendments do not alter the regime in which the
criminal offences currently operate; rather they expand the circumstances in which
a person may commit an offence (i.e. where a person refuses a test for specified
Class B or C drugs or refuses a test where arrested and/or charged with a trigger
offence). The relevant legislative safeguards will continue to apply, such as being
reminded that refusal to provide a sample is a criminal offence; having a maximum
of two samples taken during the period of detention (and a second sample only
where the first was insufficient or unsuitable); and not being tested before having
seen a custody officer. The result of a drug test is non-evidential in nature, and so
will not directly impact a person’s Article 6 rights regarding the underlying offence.
In any bail and/or sentencing decisions, mechanisms will persist for an individual
to dispute the result of a drug test and/or make representations as to its relevance.
General protections available in respect of any criminal prosecution for offences
will continue to apply. Moreover, the power to take an additional sample does not
allow for a person to commit the offence of failure to provide a sample twice over
as in order to take a second sample, a first sample must have already been taken.
Article 8 – Right to private and family life, home and correspondence
269. Article 8 is engaged as the expansion of drug testing for specified Class B and
C drugs in addition to Class A drugs, the power to take a second sample where the
first is insufficient or unsuitable, and expansion of trigger offences, may lead to
drug testing which may interfere with a person’s Article 8 rights. Private life covers
the physical integrity of a person (X and Y v Netherlands54). Peters v Netherlands55
54 App. No. 8978/80.
55 App. No. 21132/93.
60
and X v Austria56 show that the compulsory taking of a sample, even if of minor
importance/interference, constitutes an interference with a person’s body and
physical integrity under Article 8. There is a positive obligation on states to secure
their citizens the right to effective respect for their physical integrity (Milićević v
Montenegro57). Whilst the testing in these amendments is not compulsory, a refusal
to provide a sample without good cause is a criminal offence. Following a positive
result, an individual may be required to attend an initial or follow-up drug misuse
assessment (under the Drugs Act 2005); failure to attend, or to stay for the duration
of, an assessment is a criminal offence. This may interfere with a person’s Article
8 rights to private life, such as family and work life which may be affected by
attending such assessments.
270. The Government is satisfied that any interference with a person’s Article 8 rights
will be in accordance with the law as it will be prescribed in primary legislation, with
clear and detailed safeguards. It is necessary and proportionate for the prevention
of disorder and crime because it aims to address a person’s specified drug use
which is suspected to contribute to their offence (or where there is a link between
their offence and drug misuse) and reduce further reoffending. Class B and C drugs
are harmful; cannabis (a Class B drug) continues to be the most commonly used
drug in England and Wales. There is strong evidence of a clear established link
between violent offences (for example, criminal damage, assault, harassment and
football-related offending) and drug misuse, and so the Government is satisfied
that, for these offences, inspector’s authority is not necessary to ensure
proportionality. By expanding the drug testing on arrest regime, a wider cohort of
individuals will be eligible for testing and subsequent diversion into treatment, thus
reducing reoffending.
271. In addition, the power to take a second sample is necessary to allow for
expanded testing of specified Class B and C drugs, including on different testing
machines/kits. It is also tightly constrained to be proportionate: it may only be taken
where the first was insufficient or unsuitable, and where the other relevant statutory
conditions are met. Permitting multiple samples is not unprecedented: see, for
example, sections 63(3ZA)(b) and (3A)(b)(i) of PACE 1984, in relation to nonintimate samples, and section 6C(3) of the Road Traffic Act 1998, in relation to the
offence of drug driving. Further, the police will maintain discretion when exercising
this power and will need to comply with their duties under section 6 of the Human
Rights Act 1998, and under the Equality Act 2010, when doing so. Guidance will
be provided, through the PACE Codes of Practice, as to the circumstances in which
it will be appropriate to test for specified Class B and C drugs, take two samples,
and rely on trigger offences.
Article 14 – Protection from discrimination
272. There may be the potential for Article 14 to be engaged (parasitic on the Article
6 and 8 rights) on the basis that use of Class B and C drugs amongst younger
56 App. No. 8278/78.
57 App. No. 27821/16
61
people is higher, and so younger people may disproportionately have their right to
private life interfered with. The Government is satisfied that any such interference
may be objectively justified, as drug testing in police detention of persons aged 14
or over may only take place where a person has been arrested and charged for a
criminal offence, and the purpose of drug testing is to divert users into drug
treatment services and so away from further criminality. Additional safeguards are
provided in existing legislation to protect persons aged 14 to 17. The police will
maintain discretion when exercising this power and will need to comply with their
duties under section 6 of the Human Rights Act 1998, and under the Equality Act
2010, when doing so.
Cautions given to persons having limited leave to enter or remain in UK
273. Clause 101 amends section 22(3G) of the Criminal Justice Act 2003 by
expanding the definition of “relevant foreign offender” to include “an offender (other
than an Irish citizen) who has limited leave to enter or remain in the United Kingdom
(within the meaning of the Immigration Act 1971)” when the police/prosecution
consider imposing a conditional caution. A conditional caution is defined in section
22(2) CJA 2003 as “a caution which is given in respect of an offence committed by
the offender and which has conditions attached to it with which the offender must
comply.”
274. The amendment permits a condition to be attached to the conditional caution
which has one or more of the objects mentioned in section 22(3E) CJA 2003. These
objects are, “(a) bringing about the departure of the relevant foreign offender from
the United Kingdom; (b) ensuring that the relevant foreign offender does not return
to the United Kingdom for a period of time”. In practice, foreign offender conditions
require that the person departs from the UK as soon as reasonably practical and
no later than the date specified in the caution, complies with any lawful instruction
to effect removal from the UK and does not return to the UK for five years as set
out in the Immigration Rules and thereafter only in accordance with the Immigration
Rules.
Articles 2 and 3 – Right to life and freedom from torture and inhuman or
degrading treatment
275. There is a risk that offering a foreign national a conditional caution might breach
Articles 2 or 3 where the person would face treatment contrary to those articles
upon leaving the UK.
276. Section 22 of the CJA 2003 provides a power to attach foreign offender
conditions to conditional cautions but not an obligation to do so. The authorised
person has discretion to not attach foreign offender conditions where doing so
would be incompatible with the UK’s obligations under ECHR. This can be set out
in consultation with the Home Office or set out in the Ministry of Justice’s Code of
Practice for Adult Conditional Cautions and Director of Public Prosecutions
Guidance. The authorised person may impose other conditions or offer a simple
caution with no conditions attached. Accordingly, it is capable of being applied in a
62
way that is compatible with Convention rights (see Christian Institute v Lord
Advocate58). It is not therefore considered necessary to create restrictions in
primary legislation on the availability of foreign offender conditions in light of the
expanded definition of “relevant foreign offender”.
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
277. Clause 101 may also engage Article 8 because offenders within scope of the
new definition of “relevant foreign offender” may include those who have been
granted leave on the basis of rights under Article 8 and/or have established a life
or family in the UK so that Article 8 is engaged.
278. It is not considered that a decision to attach a foreign offender condition to a
conditional caution will be incompatible with Article 8, even where the offender has
leave granted on the basis of an Article 8 right to remain in the UK, because the
offender has the right to decline the caution and instead face prosecution for the
offence. Accepting the conditional caution and agreeing to leave the UK and not
return within a period of time is voluntary.
Article 14 – Protection from discrimination
279. There may be the potential for Article 14 to be engaged (parasitic on the above
Article 8 rights) on the basis that the new provision can only be applied to ‘foreign
national offenders’ and therefore discriminates on grounds of nationality, national
origin or immigration status. Foreign offender conditions may only be offered to
offenders who are not British citizens or Irish citizens, so there is a difference in
treatment based on nationality.
280. However, for an issue to engage Article 14 in the first place, there must be a
difference in the treatment of persons in analogous, or relevantly similar, situations.
The conditional caution measures are in part designed to reinforce the
maintenance of immigration control, and it is integral to the concept of immigration
control that those subject to immigration control are to be treated differently from
those who are not. Thus, the Government is satisfied there is no analogous
comparator for a person subject to a foreign offender condition attached to a
conditional caution.
281. Moreover, arguably no discrimination can be said to occur because the relevant
foreign offender offered the conditional caution has the option of declining the
caution and being charged for the offence. If there is any interference with Article
14 it is considered proportionate and objectively justified, given the offender will
only have ‘limited' leave to remain in the UK and so might be expected to depart
the UK when their leave expires in any event. And as above, the provision serves
the wider aim of protecting the public by ensuring the offender departs the UK. The
58 [2017] SC (UKSC) 29
63
Government is therefore satisfied that the proposed amendment is compatible with
Article 14.
PART 11: PROCEEDS OF CRIME AND OTHER PROPERTY
Confiscation of assets
282. Clause 102 and Schedule 14 deal with the confiscation of the proceeds of crime
and associated amendments to Part 2 of the POCA 2002 (“POCA”) (in relation to
England and Wales). Schedule 15 makes analogous provision in respect of
Northern Ireland. These measures implement several recommendations in the Law
Commission’s report Confiscation of the Proceeds of Crime After Conviction: A
Final Report59, and are designed to ensure that the confiscation regime can more
effectively deprive criminals of the benefit of criminal conduct, whilst also ensuring
that the regime is more flexible, realistic and proportionate.
Article 1, Protocol 1 – Right to Peaceful enjoyment of property
283. These provisions have bearing on the existing confiscation regime in POCA
2002 which, taken as a whole, engages the A1P1 right of the offender and
potentially of third parties. In particular, the direct interference lies in section 6 of
POCA (making a confiscation order) and in section 41 of the same (restraint
orders). Nonetheless, there are numerous provisions that determine the conditions
for exercise of those powers, and their value and scope. The Bill contains
provisions that amend elements throughout the existing legislation. Of particular
relevance for these purposes are Schedule 14, paras 1, 3, 6, 20 and 30 to 32.
284. The purpose of the confiscation regime in POCA 2002 is, fundamentally, to
deprive offenders of the benefit of crime. Despite the in personam nature of
confiscation orders, they inescapably constitute an interference in the qualified
right to peaceful enjoyment of possessions. This is because those orders require
offenders to divest themselves of interests in property (including money) so that
they may pay to the State a sum equivalent in value to their benefit from crime.
285. However, such an interference falls within the scope of the second paragraph
of A1P1, which allows States to control the use of property to secure the payment
of penalties60
.
286. To be compatible with A1P1, the interference must pursue a legitimate aim by
means reasonably proportionate to the aim sought to be realised. Generally, when
it comes to interferences with property rights, the ECtHR has ruled that States have
a wide discretion in choosing the appropriate instruments to fight crimes, including
through the use of confiscation measures61
.
59 Confiscation of the proceeds of crime after conviction: a final report (hyperlink).
60 Phillips v UK App No 41087/97, paras 50-51.
61 Among many: AGOSI v UK App No 9118/80, para 52; Gogitidze and others v Georgia App No
36862/05, para 108.
64
287. In 2012, the Supreme Court in R v Waya held that it was possible to read
section 6 of POCA 2002 (which governs the making of a confiscation order) as
being subject to a qualification that it applied “except in so far as such an order
would be disproportionate and thus a breach of article 1, Protocol 1”. The Supreme
Court found it was necessary to read such a qualification into section 6 in order to
ensure that the statute remained ECHR-compliant62
.
288. In Paulet v UK, the ECtHR also confirmed that courts must determine whether
a confiscation order would constitute a proportionate interference with the
defendant’s right to property63
.
289. Pursuant to a recommendation by the Parliamentary Joint Committee on
Human Rights64, POCA 2002 was amended by the SCA 2015 (paragraph 19 of
Schedule 4), to include express reference to proportionality. Rather than requiring
the court to make an order that the defendant pay the whole of his or her
“recoverable amount” in all circumstances, the court must make an order that the
defendant repay the recoverable amount “only if, or to the extent that, it would not
be disproportionate to require the defendant” to do so (see section 6(5) of POCA
2002).
290. It being accepted that the legislation should be read to prevent a confiscation
order being disproportionate, in R v Waya the Supreme Court said that “the difficult
question is when a confiscation order sought may be disproportionate”65
. There
are, then, some specific issues that need to be addressed with respect to the
assessment of proportionality.
(1) Objective of Confiscation
291. The logical issue that must precede the determination of whether a confiscation
order is proportionate is the identification of the aims or objectives to which that
order must be proportionate.
292. In 2020, the Court of Appeal observed in R v Andrewes that “the 2002 Act
proffers no criteria by reference to which an assessment of disproportionality for
the purposes of making a confiscation order, is to be made”66
.
293. On the basis that a proportionality assessment necessitates statutory
objectives against which the measures can be assessed, the aim of POCA 2002 is
“to deprive criminals of the proceeds of their criminality”.67 That enables courts to
assess the proportionality of the confiscation order by reference to the legitimate
62 R v Waya [2012] UKSC 51, [2013] 1 AC 294 at [16].
63Paulet v UK App No 6219/08, paras 65 to 69.
64 House of Lords and House of Commons Joint Committee on Human Rights Second Report of
Session 2014-15, HL Paper 49 HC 746 paragraph 1.23.
65 R v Waya [2012] UKSC 51, [2013] 1 AC 294 at [20] (emphasis added).
66 R v Andrewes [2020] EWCA Crim 1055, [2020] 8 WLUK 56 at [78].
67 R v Andrewes at [81] (emphasis added).
65
aim – as identified by the Supreme Court in Andrewes – “of stripping the criminal
of the fruits of crime” 68.
294. Para 1 (the principal objective) thus amends POCA 2002 so as to include a
“principal objective” with respect to the exercise of powers under Part 2 of the Act.
That principal objective is the deprivation of the defendant’s benefit of criminal
conduct, so far as within the defendant’s means.
(2) Third-party rights
295. In a few instances, the ECtHR has specifically dealt with third-party interests
affected by confiscation proceedings. When third-party interests are at stake, the
ECtHR assesses the lawfulness of the interference with property rights by following
the general approach explained in the previous section.
296. In Andonoski v the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia69 and in B.K.M.
Lojistik Tasimacilik Ticaret Limited Sirketi v Slovenia70, the ECtHR held that the
confiscation of the third-parties’ vehicles was disproportionate, because the
applicants had not been aware that the vehicles had been used for the commission
of criminal offences. In addition, the fact that the confiscation was mandatory
prevented the applicants from challenging the confiscation measure. Finally, there
was no realistic possibility for the applicants to obtain compensation. The ECtHR
concluded that a fair balance had not been struck between the demands of the
public interest and the applicants’ right to peaceful enjoyment of the possession of
their vehicles71
.
297. By contrast, in Yașar v Romania72, the ECtHR observed that the applicant had
been provided with sufficient opportunities to challenge the confiscation measure
against his vessel, since he had been allowed to submit evidence and to be
represented by a lawyer of his own choice during adversarial proceedings. The
interference with the applicant’s right in those circumstances was not
disproportionate.73
298. The ECtHR has adopted the same approach in cases where confiscation
measures have been imposed against properties held by family members of the
defendant. For example, in Silickienė v Lithuania,
74 the ECtHR found that the
confiscation of an apartment and of some shares in the possession of a widow of
a corrupt public official (acquired with the proceeds of unlawful activities) was
proportionate, since the applicant, although not convicted, was suspected of being
involved in the criminal activities run by her late husband and in any event was
68 R v Andrewes [2022] UKSC 24 at [38].
69 App No 16225/08.
70 App No 42079/12.
71 Andonoski v the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, paras 34-41; B.K.M. Lojistik Tasimacilik
Ticaret Limited Sirketi v Slovenia, paras 43-53.
72 App No 64863/13.
73 Yașar v Romania, paras 60-66.
74 App No 20496/02, paras 60-70.
66
provided with sufficient opportunities to challenge the confiscation measures
before the national courts. Similarly, in Balsamo v San Marino,
75 the ECtHR ruled
that the confiscation of assets possessed by the defendants’ daughters was
proportionate, because the daughters were able to challenge the confiscation
measures before the national courts and failed to rebut the presumption that they
had unduly benefited from unlawfully acquired properties.
299. It is evident from these cases that a fundamental feature of proportionality is
“procedural”: the ECtHR is usually satisfied that a confiscation measure is
proportionate if the third party is afforded meaningful opportunities to challenge the
confiscation of their property before national courts.
300. Section 10A of POCA 2002 gives the court the power to make a determination
as to the defendant’s (and any relevant third party’s) interest in property for the
purposes of determining the defendant’s benefit figure and available amount. This
determination is appealable by any third party to the Court of Appeal pursuant to
section 31(5)(b).
301. It follows therefore, that the proportionality of confiscation orders as they apply
to third parties is subject to appropriate scrutiny by way of the appeal and review
mechanisms as they exist and as contained in the Bill. The Government is therefore
satisfied that proportionality of the interferences with third-party interests is
compatible with the ECHR.
(3) Calculation of benefit and recoverable amount
302. It is axiomatic that proportionality demands that the calculation of benefit and
of the recoverable amount accurately reflect the defendant’s benefit from crime and
their ability to repay that benefit.
303. Para 6 (recoverable amount) provides that the recoverable amount must be
determined taking into account property seized or otherwise disgorged to the State.
This ensures that a confiscation order is not made in respect of property for which
the State has already accounted.
304. Para 15 allows for subsequent downward reconsideration of the confiscation
order where the value of an asset identified in the original confiscation order
realises a lower amount than its original valuation. This reconsideration would
reduce their overall assessed benefit, so as to prevent a defendant from being
exposed to continuing liability in respect of an artificially high benefit figure.
(4) Restraint
305. A restraint order is intended to prevent realisable property being dissipated or
put beyond the reach of the court before a confiscation order is made or enforced.
75 App No 20319/17 and 21414/17, paras 89-95.
67
It works by prohibiting any person from dealing with any realisable property
specified in the order.76
306. Alongside the statutory test for the granting of restraint pre-charge or after
proceedings have been commenced, the courts have introduced an additional test
that must be satisfied before a restraint order can be granted, known as the risk of
dissipation test.77 The prosecution must “establish that there is a real risk that
assets will be dissipated which might otherwise meet a confiscation order”.78 The
objective of this test is to determine whether any interference with A1P1 rights is
proportionate given the need to preserve assets for confiscation.
307. The primary concern with the test for restraint has been with the risk of
dissipation test. The test makes it difficult to obtain restraint orders because there
are many cases in which a risk of dissipation cannot be easily established. This is
particularly so in cases where an application for restraint is not made at the outset
of an investigation.
308. Para 24 (conditions for making of restraint order: risk of dissipation) places the
“risk of dissipation” test on a statutory footing. This paragraph also provides a list
of factors to which the court may have regard when determining the risk of
dissipation.
309. The Government is satisfied this to be of benefit for a number of reasons. First,
it would provide prosecutors and the courts with clear guidance that multiple factors
may be relevant, rather than the determination of the issue resting on whether there
has been any dissipation to date. In turn this should avoid those situations where
investigators and prosecutors have had to let some assets be dissipated to
establish the risk.
310. Second, because prosecutors and the courts would have a clear list of
indicative factors to be taken into account, the reasonableness of the arguments
on the risk of dissipation may be more readily established. This not only speaks
directly to the question of proportionality but will also lead to a reduced risk of an
adverse costs order. This should give greater confidence to prosecuting authorities
and encourage greater and responsible use of restraint powers.
311. Third, the court would be assisted in performing its function of examining each
application and this would align the approach adopted with consideration of
deprivation of liberty, another fundamental right.
312. Fourth, by articulating factors to which the court and prosecutors should have
regard, we considered that a better steer might be provided to parties in
considering whether a prosecutor has complied with their duty of candour.
76
 Proceeds of Crime Act 2002, s 41.
77
 R v B [2008] EWCA Crim 1374 at [9].
78
 R v B at [9], [13], citing Jennings v CPS [2005] EWCA Civ 746, [2006] 1 WLR 182.
68
313. Ultimately, the measures in the Bill mean that it will be clearer on the face of the
statute when it will be necessary and proportionate to interfere with a defendant’s
A1P1 rights through restraint.
Article 6 – Right to Fair Trial
(1) Criminal lifestyle assumptions
314. Section 10 of POCA provides that a number of assumptions are to be made by
the court in determining the benefit from criminal conduct. This engages Article 6(1)
(right to fair trial), which applies throughout criminal proceedings including
confiscation proceedings.79
315. It is worth noting that these assumptions do not engage Article 6(2). The Privy
Council in McIntosh v Lord Advocate and another considered that the words of
Article 6(2) did not apply to an inquiry relating to an application for a confiscation
order, because at that stage the defendant will already have been convicted and
the confiscation process “involves no accusation of any other offence.”80
316. This approach was endorsed by the ECtHR in Phillips v. UK,81 in which the
Court held that Article 6(2) is not applicable to a post-conviction inquiry into whether
or not the defendant had benefited from drug trafficking offences.
317. Section 10 of POCA 2002 provides that, if the court has determined that the
defendant has a criminal lifestyle, it must make four assumptions in calculating the
value of benefit (ie the offender’s benefit from crime). The criminal lifestyle
assumptions are one of the most far-reaching and demanding elements of the
POCA 2002 post-conviction confiscation regime. They require the defendant to
account for the last six years of financial activity, to prove that it does not represent
benefit from crime.
318. There are currently two ways in which the defendant may seek to disapply the
criminal lifestyle assumptions: by adducing evidence to demonstrate that the
application of an assumption would be wrong, and by demonstrating that the
application of an assumption would lead to a serious risk of injustice.
319. Section 10(6)(b) of POCA 2002 states that the court must not apply one of the
assumptions if “there would be a serious risk of injustice if the assumption were
made”. Case law has construed this provision particularly narrowly, and it is now
largely concerned with preventing double counting,82 rather than more general
considerations of justice. Further, defendants often struggle to provide sufficient
documentary evidence to meet the reverse burden.
79 Phillips v UK App No 41087/97, para 39.
80 McIntosh v. Lord Advocate [2003] 1 AC 1078 at [25] (Lord Bingham of Cornhill).
81 Phillips v UK at paras 31-35.
82 R v Harvey [2015] UKSC 73, [2017] AC 105; although the courts appear to have recognised the
potential for wider application of the serious risk of injustice test (see R v Waya at [25]).
69
320. The clauses in the Bill do not remove the reverse burden. Nonetheless, the
clauses do enhance the protection of an offender’s Article 6(1) rights.
321. It is first worth noting that the assumptions under POCA have not been found
to constitute an unlawful interference in a person’s Article 6(1) rights. Such
assumptions by way of reverse burden have long been held to be a “fair and
proportionate response to the need to protect the public interest.”83
322. Nonetheless, to mitigate potential interference in Article 6(1) rights, the Bill
contains a number of clauses clarifying and refining the application of the criminal
lifestyle assumptions.
323. Firstly, para 2 (prosecutor’s discretion) provides that prosecutors should have
discretion in requesting that the criminal lifestyle assumptions be applied. This will,
in appropriate cases, avoid the need for extensive, costly and intrusive
investigations at the beginning of the confiscation process where it is nonetheless
clear that such assumptions ought not apply.
324. Secondly, para 3 (the serious risk of injustice test) further defines the “serious
risk of injustice” test under section 10(6)(b) of POCA to ensure that it is not
construed unduly narrowly (ie not limited to the issue of double counting). In
particular, the clause requires the court to give appropriate weight to any evidence
before it and, in particular, “any explanation given by the defendant for being unable
to provide evidence that would have shown the assumption to be incorrect.”
(2) Reconsideration of benefit on decrease in value and sale etc
325. New section 21A of POCA, as inserted by para 15, will make provision for the
reduction of the “benefit” figure for a confiscation order. That figure is the value of
the defendant’s criminally-acquired property, as determined by the court. Where
criminally-acquired property was taken into account in calculating the benefit figure,
but was subsequently sold at a lower value than had previously been ascribed to
it, an enforcing party will be able apply to the court to reduce the overall benefit
figure to reflect the reduction in value.
326. Applications under new section 21A can only be brought by those enforcing the
order (prosecution, receivers, or designated officers), and not by the defendant.
327. This restriction on who can make an application is to ensure that applications
are only brought where an assessment has been made that the overall benefit has
not increased, without placing significant demands upon the court to take evidence
to ensure this is the case (in effect requiring the court to make a new benefit
calculation from scratch).
83 R v Benjafield [2002] UKHL 2, [2003] 1 AC 1099 at [8] (Lord Steyn).
70
328. Decisions by courts concerning property rights are subject to the right to a fair
hearing and access to the court (Article 6(1)84). Further, Article 6(1) has been held
to be applicable when the court is assessing the amount at which a confiscation
order should be set (Phillips v UK85).
329. There is no explicit duty for an enforcing party to bring an application under
section 21A any time it believes that the test for reducing the benefit figure is met.
A number of parties can bring an application. Which one is best placed to bring the
application will depend on all the circumstances. However, each enforcing party,
as a public authority for the purposes of section 6(1) of the Human Rights Act 1998,
must act in a way that is compatible with the defendant’s Convention rights. This
will include considering (and sharing between them, if necessary) any relevant new
information that comes to light about the defendant’s assets.
330. A section 21A application will be relevant where certain specific events occur
after the confiscation order, such as a sale. It does not limit or replace the
defendant’s existing right to bring an appeal against the original order where the
initially assessed benefit figure was inaccurate nor to bring an application under
existing section 23 of POCA where their available amount has decreased.
Article 8 – Right to private and family life, home and correspondence
331. There is significant overlap between the scope of A1P1 and the scope of article
8 of the ECHR, since the concept of “home” under the latter provision might fall
within the concept of “property” under the former. The ECtHR has consistently held
that “home” for the purpose of article 8 is an autonomous concept that does not
depend on the classification under domestic law: therefore, “whether or not a
particular premises constitutes a ‘home’ which attracts the protection of Article 8
will depend on the factual circumstances, namely, the existence of sufficient and
continuous links with a specific place”86
.
332. The ECtHR has clarified that the existence of a “home” is not dependent upon
the existence of property rights or interests. It follows that a person might have
property rights over a building or land for the purpose of A1P1, without having
sufficient ties with the property for it to be considered their “home” for the purpose
of Article 8 of the ECHR87. Conversely, a person may have a home in which they
hold no property rights. Where, however, a person has property rights in their
home, both Articles may be engaged. For this reason, the ECtHR has sometimes
found a violation of both Articles88, whereas in other instances it has found a
violation of one of the two Articles only89
.
84 Raimondo v Italy App No 12954/87.
85 Phillips v UK App No 41087/97.
86 Among many: Winterstein and Others v France App No 27013/07, para 141; Prokopovich v Russia
App No 58255/00, para 36.
87 Khamidov v Russia App No 72118/01, para 128; Surugiu v Romania App No 48995/99, para 63.
88 Sargsyan v Azerbaijan App No 40167/06 (Grand Chamber decision) paras 259-261.
89 Ivanova and Cherkezov v Bulgaria App No 46577/15, paras 62 and 76.
71
333. The approach followed by the ECtHR to evaluate the lawfulness of the
interference with article 8 is substantially similar to the approach followed when
A1P1 is engaged. However, an important difference between interferences with
A1P1 and interferences with Article 8 of the ECHR concerns the level of discretion
afforded to States. In fact, the ECtHR has clarified that the level of discretion
regarding Article 8 is narrower than that enjoyed by States when A1P1 is engaged,
due to “the central importance of Article 8 to the individual’s identity, selfdetermination, physical and moral integrity, maintenance of relationships with
others and a settled and secure place in the community”90. Therefore, it is possible
that the ECtHR might find a violation of article 8 and yet no violation of A1P191
.
334. In Aboufadda v France92, the ECtHR found that the confiscation of the
applicants’ house was lawful, since such an interference pursued one of the
legitimate aims mentioned in paragraph 2 of Article 8 (namely, the prevention of
disorder and crime). In addition, the ECtHR held that the interference was not
disproportionate, since national authorities had taken into account the personal
circumstances of the applicants, allowing them to remain in the house until they
had the possibility to find other accommodation (and in any event until the
conclusion of the confiscation proceedings)93
.
335. As noted above with respect to A1P1, the clauses in the Bill are designed to
ensure there is a clear relationship of proportionality between the aim of depriving
the offender of the proceeds of their criminal conduct and the confiscation
measures adopted. Where confiscation involves confiscation of the offender’s
home, this will involve close scrutiny by the court in order to avoid unlawful
interference in their Article 8 rights. As such the Government is satisfied the
provisions are compatible with Article 8.
Proceedings for civil recovery: costs and expenses
336. Clause 103 amends the Proceeds of Crime Act 2002 (“POCA”) to provide that
the court may not make an order for costs (or, in Scotland, expenses) against a
law enforcement authority in civil recovery proceedings in the High Court (or Court
of Session) unless the authority acted unreasonably in taking or furthering the
proceedings; acted dishonestly or improperly in the course of proceedings; or it
would be just and reasonable to make the order.
Article 6 – Right to fair trial
337. Proceedings under Part 5 of POCA (civil recovery) are not considered to involve
the determination of a “criminal charge” within the autonomous meaning of that
concept for the purposes of Article 6. However, civil recovery proceedings involve
the determination of civil rights or obligations and therefore engage the civil limb of
Article 6. The Government considers that restrictions on the ability to recover legal
90 Gladysheva v Russia App No 7097/10, para 93.
91 As happened in Ivanova and Cherkezov v Bulgaria App No 46577/15, paras 62 and 76.
92 Aboufadda v France App No 28457/10.
93 Aboufadda v France paras 38-43.
72
costs are capable of constituting an interference with the right of access to a court,
which would accordingly need to be justified as pursuing a legitimate aim and
proportionate to that aim.
338. The right of access to a court is a long-standing common law right, as well as
being guaranteed by Article 6 per Golder v United Kingdom94
. Černius and
Rinkevičius v Lithuania (2020) concerned modest fines levied against the
applicants for a failure to comply with local labour laws. In each case, the decision
to issue the fines was successfully challenged in domestic proceedings. However,
the legal costs incurred in doing so exceeded the level of the fine, thereby leaving
the individuals financially worse off than if they had not challenged the fines. The
domestic legal system made no provision for the recovery of costs even in the
event that the impugned decisions had been unlawful. The applicants successfully
alleged a violation of the right to access to court, under Article 6(1).
339. The Court in Černius acknowledged that public interest-related financial
considerations could sometimes play a part in the State’s policy to decrease State
expenses. However, “restricting an individual’s right to recover the costs incurred
in court when challenging the unlawful acts of public authorities, with the sole aim
of reducing the possible financial burden on the State” would be incompatible with
the Convention.
340. In Stankewicz v Poland95 the Court recognised that restrictions on the recovery
of costs against, in that case, a public prosecutor who is unsuccessful in civil
proceedings could be justified for the “protection of the legal order”. The Court in
Černius did not disregard the possibility that to limit reimbursement of litigation fees
in administrative proceedings would be legitimate in the public interest provided:
(a) the sole aim of such restriction was not reducing the possible financial burden
on the State, and (b) the proceedings to which the restriction applied were not
concerned with challenging the lawfulness of an administrative decision.
341. The Government acknowledges the importance of the general principle on
costs in ensuring that the right of access to a court is practical and effective.
However, in this particular context, it is also satisfied that there is both a need for
limitations on the ability of those subject to civil recovery proceedings to recover
their costs; and sufficient discretion for the court to prevent unfairness in individual
cases.
342. The Government is satisfied that this measure is necessary to ensure that
enforcement agencies acting in the public interest are able effectively to exercise
their powers in support of the legitimate aim pursued by the civil recovery regime
i.e. the prevention and detection of crime. And that, when taking reasonable steps
to protect the public, enforcement authorities should not be exposed to excessive
potential costs risk if they act with integrity and bring a reasoned case.
94 (1979-80) 1 EHRR 524
95 (2007) 44 EHRR 47
73
Article 1, Protocol 1 – Right to peaceful enjoyment of possessions
343. It is also assessed that Article 1 of the First Protocol is engaged by the effect of
a civil recovery order being to deprive a person permanently of their property. This
makes the right of access to a court particularly important.
344. The Government is satisfied that the exception in the clause, which enables the
Court to make the order for costs where it would be “just and reasonable”, provides
adequate safeguard against the risk that a person whose property is subject to
attempted civil recovery is unable to secure, or to fund, legal representation; that a
successful defendant may be left in the same financial position or worse off than if
they had not defended the civil recovery action at all; and/or that issues regarding
equality of arms may arise due to the fact that
where the civil recovery application is successful the persons whose assets were
recovered can still be required to pay the costs of the relevant enforcement
authority even where the person has not acted unreasonably improperly or
dishonestly96
.
345. The exception creates a flexible test, allowing room for judicial discretion. The
courts, as public authorities for the purposes of the Human Rights Act 1998, would
be required by section 6 to exercise that discretion compatibly with the Convention
rights. The proposed approach is consistent with the approach taken in respect of
forfeiture proceedings in the case of R. (Perinpanathan) v City of Westminster
Magistrates' Court97
. Accordingly, the Government is satisfied that the restrictions
proposed strike a fair balance between the rights of affected individuals to access
justice and the public interest in ensuring that civil recovery powers can be used
effectively.
PART 12: MANAGEMENT OF OFFENDERS
Extension of polygraph conditions to certain offenders
346. Clause 104 makes provision for offenders convicted of murder who pose a risk
of sexual offending, offenders sentenced concurrently for a sexual offence and
another (non-sexual) offence, offenders convicted of non-terrorism offences which
are considered to be linked to terrorism (“terrorism linked offenders”). The ECHR
rights potentially engaged by this clause are Articles 5, 6, 7, 8 and 14.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
347. Offenders who have the polygraph testing condition included in their licence
can be recalled to prison if they do not comply with testing procedures, if they make
admissions during the examination that other conditions have been breached, or if
there is evidence that their risk had increased. Therefore, Article 5 is potentially
engaged. However, the Government is satisfied that there is no unlawful
96 See Stankiewicz v Poland.
97 [2010] EWCA Civ 40
74
interference with Article 5. When indeterminate sentenced prisoners, or prisoners
serving the extended licence period of an extended determinate sentence, are
recalled, Article 5(4) is engaged. However, the recall process is compliant with
Article 5(4) because in these cases the prisoner has access to review by the Parole
Board who will consider the evidence and determine whether the offender is safe
to be released.
Article 6 – Right to fair trial
348. Information from polygraph tests can be shared with police by way of Multi
Agency Public Protection Arrangements where there is a legislative gateway to do
so under section 325 of the Criminal Justice Act 2003. Police can use the
information shared from the test to conduct further investigations into whether
criminal offences have taken place. As a result, Article 6 is potentially engaged.
However, protections against any unlawful interference with Article 6 in relation to
criminal charges are built into the Offender Management Act 2007 - section 30 of
which contains express provision prohibiting the use in criminal proceedings of
information obtained from a polygraph test. Article 6 could be engaged in relation
to civil rights if information from the tests was used to apply for a civil order against
the offender, for example a terrorism prevention and investigation measure. The
Government is satisfied that this would not breach the offender’s Article 6 rights as
the evidence presented would need to meet the relevant test for the order, and the
result of a failed polygraph test would not be the only evidence provided in such an
application but would be supported by other evidence. There would also be further
safeguards in the judicial process, as the court would be able to assess the
evidence as presented and could refuse to grant the order or make the evidence
inadmissible, if it would be unfair to the offender to admit it. In considering these
issues the court would of course be bound to act in compliance with the Human
Rights Act 1998. Consequently, if the court concluded, considering relevant public
interest matters, that making any such order based on information from a polygraph
test would breach the offender’s Article 6 rights it would be obliged to refuse the
application for the order.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
349. As the provision is to apply to all offenders serving a relevant custodial sentence
and not just to offenders sentenced after the date on which the measure comes
into force, Article 7 should be considered. As polygraph conditions are a licence
condition, they are an execution or enforcement component of the sentence which
has been handed down by the court, and are not an additional or new penalty being
imposed retrospectively for the purposes of Article 7 of the ECHR. Article 7 is
therefore not breached by these measures.
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
350. Mandatory polygraph testing engages Article 8, however the Government is
satisfied that any interference with an offender’s rights by imposition of this
condition is justified in pursuit of a legitimate aim: namely, that it is necessary in a
75
democratic society in the interests of public safety, for the prevention of
crime/disorder, and for the protection of the rights and freedoms of others.
Polygraph testing has been proven to be effective in managing the risk posed by
offenders convicted of sexual and terrorist offences, and therefore where these
types of offending (or a risk of offending) are identified, its imposition on these
offenders is considered a necessary and important tool to manage the risks they
pose. Further, if the availability of a polygraph condition allows offenders to be
released on licence who would otherwise be deemed unsafe and would remain in
prison, then this is a less restrictive outcome for those prisoners. For example, the
Parole Board recently expressed their concern around their inability to impose a
polygraph condition on an offender despite the sexually motivated nature of the
crimes committed. It is the Government’s intention that the condition will only be
imposed on offenders who are assessed as high/very high risk of causing serious
harm in their static risk assessment, or on a discretionary basis on offenders who
are not assessed as high/very high risk, but the polygraph condition is necessary
and proportionate in order to manage them in the community. These cases will only
arise in limited circumstances where offenders have not been assessed as high or
very high risk of serious harm in their static risk assessment but there is evidence
of dynamic risk factors that indicate an imminent risk of serious harm upon release.
This will be regulated by way of a published policy.
351. Information from polygraph testing may be shared with partner agencies such
as the police and other listed agencies, in accordance with section 14 of the
Offender Management Act 2007 or other statutory information-sharing provisions.
Owing to the sensitivity of polygraph testing information, such information sharing
will be conducted in strict compliance with the legislative scheme, in compliance
with the Data Protection Act 2018 to ensure it is proportionate, lawful and
necessary, in accordance with information protection already in place for sex
offender polygraph information. The Government is therefore satisfied that any
interference with offenders’ Article 8 rights will be compliant with the ECHR.
Article 14 – Protection from discrimination
352. Although Article 14 should be considered, since the measures fall within the
ambit of other Convention rights, we do not consider that these measures breach
the Article. The Government does not consider that the cohorts affected by these
measures have a protected “status”. Offenders will be subject to the polygraph
condition either due to the gravity of their offending or to the nature of their
sentencing, neither of which the Government is satisfied that relevant statuses.
There are strong arguments for the objective justification of the proposed extension
of polygraph testing. The imposition of the condition in each case pursues a
legitimate aim, this being public safety, the prevention of crime/disorder, and the
protection of the rights and freedoms of others. Polygraph testing has been proven
to be an effective tool to help manage the risks posed by sexual and terrorist
offenders, and it is just and proportionate for it to be used to assist in protecting the
public from those who pose a high risk to public safety. As set out above, testing
76
will only be imposed on offenders where the polygraph condition is necessary and
proportionate in order to manage them in the community.
Duty of offenders to notify details
353. Clause 105 places a new duty on offenders serving a sentence in the
community, requiring them to inform their responsible officer if they change their
name, use a different name (for example, an alias), or change their contact
information. This will ensure that while an offender is serving a sentence in the
community, the responsible officers have the information they need to manage that
the offender, with the ability to take enforcement action where necessary.
354. Community sentences are punitive and rehabilitative sentences imposed by the
court that are served by offenders in the community instead of in prison custody.
355. Under the Sentencing Code:
a) A referral order must be imposed on a youth offender under the age of 18
with no prior convictions who pleads guilty to an imprisonable offence. The
court has the power when dealing with an offender for breach for noncompliance of a referral order to allow the order to continue, extend the
length of the order for up to a maximum of 12 months, impose a fine up to
a maximum of £2500, or revoke the order and resentence the offender.
b) A youth rehabilitation order is available to a court where the individual is
under the age of 18, and a community order is available to a court where
the individuals is the age of 18 or over, where a criminal offence is
imprisonable. Individuals who breach the requirements of their community
sentence and are brought back before a judge can, at the more lenient end,
be subject to having their existing order made more onerous or extended,
or have a fine imposed, and at the most grave can be re-sentenced in any
way that they could originally have been had they only just been convicted
of the offence, including being sentenced to imprisonment (if there has been
wilful and persistent breach of the requirements) unless it would be unjust
to do so. As community sentences may only be imposed for offences which
carry a custodial penalty, custody will be an option on re-sentencing.
c) A suspended sentence order is available for individuals aged 21 or over
where a court passes a prison sentence of at least 14 days but no more
than 2 years. For individuals between the ages of 18 and 20, it is available
where the term of sentence is not more than 2 years. A suspended sentence
order provides that a sentence of imprisonment or detention in a Youth
Offender Institution is not to take effect unless an “activation event” occurs
and there is a court order that the sentence is to take effect. An “activation
event” occurs if the individual commits another offence when the order is in
force or contravenes any community requirement during the supervision
period of the order.
77
356. Accordingly, these community sentences (except referral orders) are subject to
enforcement, with committal to custody for non-compliance as a prospective
sanction under Schedule 7, 10 and 16 of the Sentencing Code.
357. This measure will place a new duty on offenders serving a sentence in the
community, and who are supervised by probation or a youth offending team,
requiring them to inform the responsible officer if they change their name, use a
different name (e.g. an alias) or change their contact information. The name
change could be for any reason. The intention is for this measure to capture not
just formal legal changes of names by deed poll but also any aliases. For example,
the use of an online alias.
358. This measure also places a duty on offenders to inform the responsible officer
of any additions or changes to contact details, including any phone number or
email, and to provide the power to initiate breach proceedings. This is intended to
reinforce the supervisory role of the responsible officer and relationship with the
offender. Any breach of the duty mentioned above would be treated as a breach of
a requirement, also set out above.
359. In August 2022, the Criminal Justice (Sentencing) (Licence Conditions)
(Amendment) (No.2) Order 2022 (SI 2022/703) amended the Criminal Justice
(Sentencing) (Licence Conditions) (Amendment) Order 2015 (SI 2015/337)
requiring offenders sentenced to imprisonment serving part of that sentence on
licence in the community to inform their probation officer if they change their name.
This measure therefore creates consistency about the way offenders serving a
sentence in the community, are managed.
360. The ECHR rights engaged by this clause are Articles 5, 7, and 8.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
361. The clause engages Article 5, because offenders who are serving Suspended
Sentence Orders may have their original custodial sentence activated following a
breach hearing if they do not comply with the duty to notify while being managed
in the community. Also, offenders serving a community sentence who breach the
duty in the order imposed by the court can be resentenced and receive a custodial
sentence, and the court can also impose a custodial sentence for breach of a youth
rehabilitation order. However, the detention for non-compliance measure falls
within the authorised circumstances prescribed by Article 5(1) where deprivation of
liberty is lawful, namely after conviction of a competent court, and it does not
breach Article 5 because the detention will at all times be in accordance with Article
5(1)(a). For these reasons, this clause is considered to be compatible with Article
5.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
362. This measure will affect offenders who have committed an offence but have not
yet been convicted when it comes into force. Further, offenders would be breached
78
for a failure to comply with the duty to notify while being managed in the community
under the Sentencing Code. Article 7 should therefore be considered. However,
there is no retrospective increase to a penalty as the measure is a management
tool for the administration of the sentence going forward and it is incapable of
altering the sentence imposed by the court before commencement (in compliance
with the principles in Del Rio Prada v Spain, and (Uttley v UK, Csoszanski v
Sweden and M v Germany). It is well-established that a change in the
administration of a sentence does not form part of the ‘penalty’ within the meaning
of Article 7 (Hogben v United Kingdom; and again confirmed in Abedin v the United
Kingdom, and R (Khan) v Secretary of State for Justice. For these reasons, the
Government is satisfied that this clause to be compatible with Article 7.
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
363. Article 8 is engaged by this measure because the duty to notify probation or
youth offender team of name changes or contact details requires offenders to
provide information about their private life. However, the Government is satisfied
that any interference with Article 8 rights is necessary, justified and in accordance
with the law. The measure pursues a legitimate aim: to protect members of the
public, and for the prevention of crime and disorder. The requirement to inform the
responsible officer is necessary to effectively manage the offender. Furthermore,
the requirement for offenders serving referral orders or community sentences to
inform the responsible officer if they use a different name or change their contact
details is proportionate as the requirement is for enforcement of the sentence
imposed by the court and is only applicable while the order imposed by the court
is in force. For these reasons, this clause is considered to be compatible with Article
8.
PART 14: TERRORISM AND NATIONAL SECURITY
Youth Diversion Orders
364. Chapter 1 of Part 14 creates new Youth Diversion Orders (“YDOs”) to disrupt
under-21s involved in terrorism and divert them from the wider criminal justice
system, including prosecution. The police will be able to apply to the youth or
magistrates’ court to impose a YDO on someone under 21 if, on the balance of
probabilities, the court assesses there is evidence that the individual has
committed a terrorism offence; or a non-terrorism offence with a terrorism
connection; or has conducted him/herself in a way that is likely to facilitate the
commission by him/herself or another person of a specified terrorism offence
(whether or not the offence is committed); and the court considers the order is
necessary for the purposes of protecting the public from a risk of terrorism or other
serious harm (“terrorism” has the meaning given by section 1 of the Terrorism Act
2000, and “serious harm” is defined in clause 111 and includes, for example, harm
from conduct that involves serious violence against a person).
79
365. The YDO would allow the court to impose various measures on the YDO
subject, such as to control their use of electronic devices, who they can associate
with and to mandate their attendance at appointments with mentors.
Articles 8, 9 and 10 – Rights to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence, freedom of thought, conscience and religion and freedom
of expression.
366. The conditions imposed by a YDO may engage Articles 8, 9 or 10. In respect
of these rights, the Government is satisfied any interference will be justified as
being in pursuance of the legitimate aims of protecting national security. Crucially,
any interference will only be applied where considered necessary by the court to
achieve this aim and to protect the public. The court must tailor measures to the
particular harms they seek to prevent on a case-by-case basis, ensuring
proportionality. The legislation will contain examples of the most likely measures.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
367. These provisions engage Article 5 because breach of an order will be a criminal
offence which can result in the arrest and detention of an individual. To the extent
that this offence results in a person being deprived of their liberty, the Government
is satisfied that the offences fall within the authorised circumstances prescribed by
Article 5(1) where deprivation of liberty is lawful (Article 5(1)(a), (b) and (c). The
procedural safeguards required by Article 5(2) to (4) will be assured through the
ordinary procedures of the criminal justice system.
Article 6 – Right to a fair trial
368. In respect of Article 6, the YDO is not considered to involve the determination
of a criminal charge and therefore the application of the civil standard or proof is
considered appropriate with the imposition of positive requirements without the prerequisite of a conviction. Applying the Engel criteria, the aim of the YDO is the
prevention of crime and rehabilitation of young people and a YDO can only be
made in circumstances where an order is necessary to address the risk to the
public. See also Jones v Birmingham CC and Secretary of State for the Home
Department98 and Secretary of State for the Home Department v MB99
. The
Government is satisfied that these civil proceedings clearly satisfy any fair trial
requirements arising under the civil limb of Article 6(1). The rules which govern the
imposition of a YDO made by the court ensure participation of the person
concerned in the court process and the existence of a prescribed right of appeal
and ability to apply to the court to vary or discharge the order affords further
safeguards. The Government is satisfied that adequate safeguards are provided to
ensure procedural safeguards.
98 [2023] UKSC 27
99 [2008] 1 AC 440
80
Prevention of terrorism and state threats: weapons etc (TPIMs and STPIMs)
369. The effect of clause 122 is to widen the things that can be covered under the
weapons and explosives measure that can be imposed on someone given a TPIM
notice under the Terrorism Prevention and Investigation Measures Act 2011 or a
STPIM under the National Security Act 2023. This is to ensure TPIM and STPIM
subjects can be prohibited from possessing articles, such as kitchen knives or
vehicles, which may have other legitimate uses but are assessed as having
potential to be used as a weapon by the TPIM or STPIM subject, and that are
broader than the current definition of ‘offensive weapons’.
Article 9 – Right to freedom of thought, conscience and religion
370. Article 9 may be engaged as the measure might have the effect of depriving an
individual of an article that might be used in religious observance, where such an
article might also be used as a weapon. Any interference would be justified as it is
necessary to protect national security specifically to reduce the risk of a terrorist
attack or hostile state activity, and it is proportionate as it can only be imposed
where a court has assessed the decision that it is necessary for public protection.
Article 1 Protocol 1 – Right to peaceful enjoyment of property
371. A1P1 may be engaged as the measure may have the effect of depriving an
individual of ownership of their property which could have other legitimate uses,
such as a kitchen knife or vehicle. This prohibition can be imposed where the court
approves the Secretary of State’s assessment that such a measure is necessary,
for purposes connected with protecting members of the public from a risk of
terrorism or hostile state activity.
372. As above, any interference would be justified as it is necessary to protect
national security specifically to reduce the risk of a terrorist attack or hostile state
activity, and it is proportionate as it can only be imposed where a court has
assessed the decision that it is necessary for public protection.
Offence of wearing or displaying articles in support of proscribed organisation
373. Under section 13(1) of the Terrorism Act 2000 (“TACT”), it is an offence for a
person in a public place to wear an item of clothing or wear, carry or display an
article (e.g. a flag) – in a way or circumstances that arouse reasonable suspicion
that they are a member or support of a proscribed organisation.100 It is a strict
liability offence and, on summary conviction, a person is liable to a fine and/or
imprisonment for no more than 6 months.
374. A “public place” is defined at section 121 TACT as a place to which members
of the public have, or are permitted to have, access. The wings of a prison would
not satisfy this definition, for example. The Independent Reviewer of Terrorism
100 A proscribed organisation is an organisation that is listed in Schedule 2 TACT for being concerned
in terrorism (the power to amend this list is in section 3 of that Act).
81
Legislation (IRTL) recommended in his 2022 report101 that the offence at section
13(1) should be capable of being committed in a prison.
375. The proposed measures in clause 123 amends section 13 TACT such that
conduct that would be an offence under section 13(1) could be an offence if it
happened in a prison or another place listed in the Bill. The relevant premises are
listed at subsection (4), which includes immigration removal centres (IRCs).
376. In these settings, there is considered to be a cohort of people vulnerable to
being drawn into terrorism due to various factors, including in particular their history
of offending and relating to their detention. The proposed measures serve the
policy aims of deterring people from terrorist-related activity, reducing the risk of
radicalisation, and the State’s maintenance of good order and prevention of crime
in detention facilities.
Article 10 - right to freedom of expression
377. Insofar as the amendments to s13 TACT interfere with rights under Article 10,
the interference can be justified under Article 10(2) and the proposed measures
are compatible with the ECHR in this respect.
378. The existing offence at section 13(1) TACT was found compatible with Article
10 in Pwr v. DPP102
. The proposed measures would not amend the components of
the offence beyond the locations at which the offence may be committed. They will
be prescribed by law and serve the same legitimate aim as the existing offence in
depriving proscribed organisations of the “oxygen of publicity”.
379. In serving this aim, the proposed measures are necessary to disrupt
radicalisation and other terrorist-related activity in prisons and other places of
detention as is presently the case for public places. They will ensure that authorities
can maintain good order in State detention and prioritise addressing concerning
behaviour that is considered to radically influence others and potentially draw them
into terrorism. The Government considers it necessary that, where persons are
subject to detention, the State can control the environment to prevent and deter
the radicalisation of others, particularly vulnerable individuals.
380. The extension of the existing, ECHR-compatible offence to these places is a
proportionate means of achieving these legitimate aims. Whilst the range of
locations at which the offence can be committed is expanded, the relevant conduct
remains narrowly drawn to be concerned with wearing, carrying or displaying
articles that arouse suspicion relating to membership or support of proscribed
organisations, i.e. those considered by HMG to be concerned in terrorism and
accordingly listed in Schedule 2 TACT. In this way, the offence focuses on
associations with the most harmful groups.
101https://assets.publishing.service.gov.uk/government/uploads/system/uploads/attachment_data/file/1
071318/terrorism-in-prisons
102 [2022] 1 W.L.R. 789
82
381. Interference with the qualified right to freedom of expression at Article 10 ECHR
is, accordingly, justified in the interests of national security and the prevention of
crime and disorder.103
Article 1, Protocol 1 – right to peaceful enjoyment of property
382. The proposed measure does not criminalise the possession of items of clothing
or other articles and so does not deprive a person of their possessions but it does
extend the circumstances in which the wearing, carrying or display of such an item
or article constitutes a criminal offence and, to that extent, may represent a control
of use. This Government is satisfied any interference in this respect justified.
383. The provisions amend existing powers in legislation. Any interference will be
prescribed by law and proportionate to the general or public interests of preventing
terrorist-related activity and preserving good order in State detention as set out for
Article 10 above.
Management of terrorist offenders - notification requirements and stop and
search
384. Clause 124 and Schedule 16 enable the Secretary of State or the police to
apply to a court to impose the notification requirements under Part 4 of the CounterTerrorism Act 2008 on certain offenders who are not presently subject to them. The
court will be required to make the order if it is satisfied that the offence had a
terrorist connection, and that the offence was not eligible to be determined as
having such a connection when it was dealt with by the courts.
385. An order will be available only in respect of serving prisoners or offenders who
are released on licence. If the order is made, the offender will be subject to the
notification requirements for a period calculated by reference to the length of their
sentence.
386. An offender who is the subject of an order will also become subject to the police
powers under sections 43B and 43C of the Terrorism Act 2000 (“TACT”) while they
are released on licence. The offender can be arrested on reasonable suspicion of
a breach of their licence conditions while a decision is made on whether or not to
recall them to prison (if the arrest is considered necessary to protect the public).
The offender can also be stopped and searched if it is a condition of their licence
that they submit to such a search and the officer conducting the search considers
it necessary to protect the public from a risk of terrorism.
387. The application of the notification requirements to persons who were sentenced
in the past does not engage Article 7 ECHR. Although the notification requirements
are directly linked to an offender’s sentence, they do not constitute a penalty. In
103 Donaldson v the United Kingdom 56975/09
83
Ibbotson104 the ECtHR held that the application of notification requirements that
were very similar to these did not amount to a penalty. In reaching that conclusion,
the court emphasised that the purpose of the notification requirements was to be
preventative (i.e. in terms of managing the risk posed by the offender) rather than
punitive.
Article 8 ECHR – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
388. The application of the notification requirements to an offender who is the subject
of an order may constitute an interference with their Article 8 rights. Similarly, if an
offender is, following the order, later subjected to a stop and search (under section
43C TACT), the search may also involve an interference with their Article 8 rights.
Notification requirements
389. The imposition of the notification requirements is in accordance with the law, is
justified by the need to protect the public from the risk of terrorism, and is a
proportionate means of achieving that justification. Offenders will be subject to the
notification requirements only if a court grants the order, which provides protection
against the risk of the arbitrary application of the requirements.
390. In Irfan105, the Court of Appeal held that the terrorism notification requirements
were proportionate (the requirements were expanded in 2019, although the
principles remain the same). The Court observed that terrorism offences fall into a
special category of seriousness such that a precautionary approach is appropriate.
Each requirement can clearly be linked to managing the risk associated with
terrorist activity. For example, notification of foreign travel can help prevent a
person travelling abroad to receive terrorist-related training.
Stop and search power
391. The interference that will arise if an offender is subject to a stop and search
under section 43C is in accordance with the law, is justified by the need to protect
the public from the risk of terrorism, and is a proportionate means of achieving the
justified aim.
392. Section 43C was introduced following a recommendation made by the
Independent Reviewer of Terrorism Legislation. It may be exercised without the
need for reasonable grounds; and is therefore a so-called “suspicion less stop-andsearch” power. Such powers may be in accordance with the law for the purposes
of Article 8, provided that, considered in all the relevant circumstances, they
provide adequate safeguards against arbitrary use.
104Ibbotson v UK [1999] Crim. LR. 153. The Court made similar findings in Gardel v. France
(Application no. 16428/05).
105 R (on the application of Irfan) v Secretary of State for the Home Department [2012] EWCA Civ
1471.
84
393. In Beghal106 the Supreme Court held that the powers under Schedule 7 to the
Terrorism Act 2000 that allow for persons to be detained, searched and questioned
while passing through the UK Border, without the need for a basis of suspicion,
were in accordance with the law for the purposes of Article 8.
394. In finding that the Schedule 7 power was in accordance with the law, the Court
noted various factors, including that the powers could be exercised only against an
identifiable group, and for a specific purpose. The power under section 43C may
be exercised only in relation to terrorist offenders out on licence; and only those in
respect of whom the Parole Board or the Secretary of State has concluded that it
is necessary and proportionate to include this as a licence condition. The power is
therefore restricted to persons who pose a substantially greater terrorism risk to
the public.
395. In order to exercise the power, the constable carrying out the search must
consider that the search is necessary for purposes connected with protecting the
public from a risk of terrorism. While the constable does not have to have
reasonable grounds for that view, they must honestly hold it; and if necessary be
able to set out the reasons why they formed that belief. The officer must consider
that the search is necessary rather than merely useful or expedient. Finally, officers
must exercise this power in accordance with the relevant PACE Code of Practice.
396. These factors are sufficient to ensure that the search power, and its extension
to this group of offenders, is proportionate.
Sentences for offence of breaching foreign travel restriction order
397. Clause 125 makes provision for an additional offence (breaching a foreign
travel restriction order (‘BFTRO’)) to be captured by the terrorist offenders
sentencing, restricted release, and management on licence regimes. ECHR
Articles 5, 7, 8 and 14 may be engaged but they are not infringed by this measure.
Changes to sentencing arrangements
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
398. Offenders convicted after date of commencement of these provisions will no
longer receive a standard determinate sentence, but must, if they do not receive
an extended determinate sentence for this offending, receive a sentence for
offenders of particular concern (or terrorism sentence in Scotland or Northern
Ireland), which is a determinate sentence, with a licence period fixed for one year
to supervise the offender. The sentencing regime provides the court with
discretion, when imposing the overall sentence, to ensure that the resulting
deprivation of liberty is not arbitrary for the purposes of Article 5 and is
proportionate in all the circumstances
Changes to release arrangements
106 Beghal v DPP [2015] UKSC 79.
85
Article 7 – No punishment without law
399. If any offenders are convicted of BFTRO between now and the coming into
force of the changes, their release arrangements will be altered from halfway
automatic release to two-thirds Parole Board release. This provision also gives
power to specify in a warrant for a repatriated prisoner charged with/convicted of
an equivalent offence that they will be subject to all the same measures as a
domestic terrorist offender. However, although the power to amend a warrant is
broad in that it applies to warrants issued before the coming into force of the
provisions, it is strictly cast to only permit the Secretary of State to prescribe on the
face of the warrant that the offender has committed a terrorism or terrorist
designated offence the equivalent of which is strictly delineated in the Bill measures
and corresponding legislation, and based upon findings made by the court before
which the prisoner was tried or sentenced for the overseas offence. These
amendments are changes to the administration of the sentence, not the sentence
itself. For the same reasons, it is not considered that the repatriation clause(s) will
contravene Article 7: R (Khan) v Secretary of State for Justice [2020] 1 WLR 3932
Morgan v Ministry of Justice [2024] AC 130.
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
400. Offenders convicted for BFTRO will become eligible for and subject to
polygraph licence conditions like other terrorist offenders. Information from
polygraph testing may be shared with partner agencies such as the police and
other listed agencies, in accordance with s14 of the Offender Management Act
2007 or other statutory provisions. Due to the sensitivity of polygraph testing
information, such information sharing will be in conducted in strict compliance with
the legislative scheme (i.e. Data Protection Act 2018) to ensure it is proportionate,
lawful and necessary, in accordance with information protection already in place
for sex offender polygraph information. Thereby any interference with offenders’
Article 8 rights will be ECHR compliant.
Power of arrest
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
401. Article 5 is engaged only where an act of detention constitutes a deprivation of
liberty rather than a restriction of movement. It is unclear whether this new power
crosses the threshold of a deprivation of liberty given the maximum period of
detention of six hours and the requirement to release the prisoner sooner if
possible. However, given that there is uncertainty, and given that is involves a
power of arrest, the compatibility of the power with Article 5 has been analysed on
the basis that it may involve a deprivation of liberty. The lawful basis for deprivation
is provided for by primary legislation and is exercisable only in relation to prisoners
serving their sentence while released on licence, in connection with the anticipated
recall of the prisoner. The Government is satisfied that the new power contains
sufficient safeguards against arbitrary use such that it is meets the necessary
requirements for the purposes of Article 5(1).
Power to search a terrorist prisoner released on licence
86
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
402. The search condition will constitute an interference with the Article 8 rights of
prisoners. The power created by this clause may be exercised without the need for
reasonable grounds; and is therefore a so-called “suspicion-less stop-and-search”
power. Such powers may be in accordance with the law for the purposes of Article
8, provided that, considered in all the relevant circumstances, they provide
adequate safeguards against arbitrary use. Adding BFTRO offenders to the
terrorism management conditions regime is considered to be justified and
proportionate: for example, the terrorist attacks at Fishmongers Hall and Streatham
demonstrated the risk posed to the public from terrorist prisoners who are released
from prison on licence; and the licence conditions are therefore justified in order to
protect the public.
All changes within this clause
Article 14 – Protection from discrimination
403. There may be groups with characteristics who are over-represented in receiving
BTFRO. However, the measures are imposed based on the gravity of offending
(which is not an ‘other status’) the provision will apply equally to all relevant terrorist
offenders, regardless of race, religion or otherwise. The court held in R (Khan) v
Secretary of State for Justice [2020] EWHC 2084 (Admin) that prisoners treated
differently due to the category of offence they have committed are not protected by
Article 14, and if a category of offence is chosen due to the gravity of offence, this
cannot be an “other status” (see also Gerger v Turkey (application no. 24919/94
1999 [GC]). In any event, it is considered that there is objective justification to treat
terrorist offenders differently than other offenders, given the unique nature of
offences and unquantifiable risk posed. It is therefore considered that, given the
wide margin of appreciation afforded to States in the area of penal policy requiring
a measure to be manifestly without reasonable foundation before a breach will be
found (see R(CS) v Secretary of State for Work and Pensions (2021 UKSC 26 at
para 160) any differences of treatment are justifiable in pursuing the legitimate aim
of protecting the public from terrorist offenders In any event, any differential
treatment related to type of offending is justified, proportionate and necessary as a
public protection measure, given the serious risk to the public. Therefore, Article
14 is not breached.
Length of terrorism sentence with fixed licence period in Northern Ireland
404. Clause 126 ensures terrorism sentences with a fixed licence period available
for terrorist offenders in Northern Ireland are handed down consistently with the
equivalent sentence in England and Wales. ECHR Articles 5, 7, 8 and 14 are
engaged but not infringed by this measure.
Article 5 – Right to liberty and security
405. The terrorism sentence provides the court with discretion, when imposing the
sentence, to ensure that the resulting deprivation of liberty is not arbitrary for the
purposes of Article 5. The sentence imposed is one which the court considers is
87
proportionate in all the circumstances, as required at section 231 of the Sentencing
Code. The discretion is retained because the court decides whether to impose a
custodial sentence and if so, the length of it. The court does not have a discretion
over the licence period but retains the discretion as to the length of the custodial
term. The Department is satisfied that this provision does not infringe Article 5.
Article 7 – No punishment without law
406. The Sentence for Offenders of Particular Concern (SOPC) additions will apply
to all offenders in Northern Ireland sentenced for specified terrorist offences after
commencement, which means that it will be available to the courts to impose on
offenders who had committed an offence prior to commencement but not yet been
sentenced and Article 7 should therefore be considered. However, the availability
of SOPC disposal for these offences is not an effect that breaches the prohibition
against the retrospective application of a heavier penalty in Article 7; where the
court looks to determine if a heavier penalty has been applied than that initially
applied, it will look at the maximum applicable penalty that applied to the offence
at the time of the offending itself. These changes to do not operate to change the
maximum applicable penalty. The Government therefore is satisfied that Article 7
is not breached.
Article 8 – Right to respect for private and family life, home and
correspondence
407. Article 8 is engaged as an offender will spend time in prison which is an
interference to the right of a family life. However, there is no breach of Article 8
because the imposition, and the serving of a prison sentence is a proportionate
interference with that right, further to conviction by a competent court.
Article 14 – Protection from discrimination
408. There may be groups with certain protected characteristics who will be overrepresented in receiving a SOPC. Any difference in treatment is based on the type
of offending which can have catastrophic consequences and not on the personal
characteristics of the offender. The new provision will apply equally to all relevant
terrorist offenders, regardless of race, religion or otherwise. The court held in R
(Khan) v Secretary of State for Justice [2020] EWHC 2084 (Admin) that prisoners
treated differently due to the category of offence they have committed are not
protected by Article 14, and if a category of offence is chosen due to the gravity of
offence, this cannot be an “other status” (see also Gerger v Turkey (application no.
24919/94 1999 [GC]). In any event, it is considered that there is objective
justification to treat terrorist offenders differently than other offenders, given the
unique nature of offences and unquantifiable risk posed. It is therefore considered
that, given the wide margin of appreciation afforded to States in the area of penal
policy requiring a measure to be manifestly without reasonable foundation before
a breach will be found (see R(CS) v Secretary of State for Work and Pensions
[2021] UKSC 26 at para 160) any differences of treatment are justifiable in pursuing
the legitimate aim of protecting the public from terrorist offenders. Therefore, Article
14 is not breached.
88
PART 16: MISCELLANEOUS AND GENERAL
Criminal liability of bodies corporate and partnerships where senior manager
commits offence
409. Clause 130 enables a corporate body or partnership to be held criminally liable
where a senior manager commits any offence while acting within the actual or
apparent authority granted by the organisation. These provisions expand on the
reform of such liability for economic crimes under the Economic Crime and
Corporate Transparency Act 2023 and provide a clear test for prosecutors and
courts to apply, and better capture situations where control is dispersed among a
number of senior managers.
410. Clause 130 imposes liability upon a relevant body for the conduct of a senior
manager, and potentially amounts to an interference with the Article 6 presumption
of innocence. However, it is recognised that the UK courts have long accepted
liability in the context of employer-employee relationships, in both civil and (with
more reluctance) criminal law. The senior manager must be acting within the scope
of his/her actual or apparent authority; the relationship is a voluntary one, and the
company has chosen to put the manager in a position in which s/he is able to
engage in criminal conduct while acting in their capacity as a senior manager.
411. In principle, any penalty imposed in proceedings using the new doctrine is
capable of amounting to an interference with A1P1 rights of owners, shareholders,
partners, etc. Where a company or partnership is involved in the commission of
criminal offences, through its senior management, it is reasonable and
proportionate to impose penalties.
412. Where a fine is imposed, this is a "deprivation" and must be in the public interest
and subject to conditions provided for by law and by general principles of
international law. In this case, any fine could only be imposed following criminal
proceedings with concomitant protections for the rights of defendants, including
procedural rights and discretion on the part of prosecutors (as to whether to
institute proceedings) and courts (as to the penalty to be imposed); public
prosecutors and courts are public bodies for the purposes of the Human Rights Act
1998 and required to comply with the Convention rights.
Home Office, Ministry of Justice and Ministry of Defence
25 February 2025 
